CIK: 1082554
Company Name: UNITED THERAPEUTICS CORP
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2011-02-24
Accession Number: 0001047469-11-001229


ITEM 1 BUSINESS United Therapeutics Corporation is a biotechnology company focused on the development and commercialization of unique products to address the unmet medical needs of patients with chronic and life threatening conditions. Our key therapeutic products and product candidates are Prostacyclin Analogues. Prostacyclin analogues are stable synthetic forms of prostacyclin, an important molecule produced by the body that has powerful effects on blood vessel health and function. Our lead product is Remodulin (treprostinil) Injection (Remodulin) to be administered subcutaneously or intravenously for the treatment of pulmonary arterial hypertension (PAH). The United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) initially approved Remodulin in 2002 for subcutaneous (under the skin) administration. Subsequently, the FDA broadened its approval of Remodulin for intravenous (in the vein) use and for the treatment of patients who require transition from Flolan . In addition to the United States, Remodulin is approved in many other countries, primarily for subcutaneous use. In July 2009, the FDA approved Tyvaso (treprostinil) Inhalation Solution (Tyvaso), an inhaled prostacyclin therapy for the treatment of PAH. We commenced commercial sales of Tyvaso in the third quarter of 2009. Our oral tablet of treprostinil diethanolamine is in the later stages of development. Our subsidiary, Lung Rx, LLC (Lung Rx), is separately developing modified release beraprost (beraprost MR), another type of oral prostacyclin analogue, for the treatment of PAH; Phosphodiesterase Type 5 (PDE 5) Inhibitor. PDE 5 inhibitors act to inhibit the degradation of cyclic guanosine monophosphate (cGMP) in cells. cGMP is activated by nitric oxide (NO) to signal relaxation of vascular smooth muscle. Our PDE 5 inhibitor product is Adcirca (tadalafil) tablets (Adcirca), a once daily oral therapy for the treatment of PAH. We acquired certain exclusive commercialization rights to Adcirca from Eli Lilly and Company (Lilly) in 2008. In May 2009, the FDA approved Adcirca for the treatment of PAH. We commenced commercial sales of Adcirca in the third quarter of 2009; Monoclonal Antibodies (MAb). MAb act by targeting tumor associated antigens on cancer cells to activate a patient's immune system against the cancer cells. We are developing the antibody Ch14.18 MAb for the treatment of neuroblastoma, under an agreement with the National Cancer Institute. We are also developing another antibody, 8H9 MAb, for the treatment of metastatic brain cancer, under an agreement with Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center; and Glycobiology Antiviral Agents. Glycobiology antiviral agents are a novel class of small, sugar like molecules that have shown pre clinical indications of efficacy against a broad range of viruses. We devote most of our research and development resources to developing these key products and product candidates. We generate revenues primarily from the sale of Remodulin, Tyvaso and Adcirca (which we refer to as our commercial products). Our sales and marketing staff supports the availability of our commercial products in the countries in which they are approved. These efforts are supplemented by our specialty pharmaceutical distributors in the United States and our other distributors internationally. United Therapeutics was incorporated in Delaware in June 1996. Our principal executive offices are located at 1040 Spring Street, Silver Spring, Maryland 20910. We also maintain executive offices at 55 T.W. Alexander Drive, Research Triangle Park, North Carolina 27709. 3 Table of Contents Unless the context requires otherwise or unless otherwise noted, all references in this Annual Report on Form 10 K to "United Therapeutics" and to the "company", "we", "us" or "our" are to United Therapeutics Corporation and its subsidiaries. Our Products Our product portfolio includes the following as of February 15, 2011 Product Mode of Delivery Indication Market Current Status Our Territory Remodulin Continuous subcutaneous Pulmonary arterial hypertension Commercial in the U.S., most of Europe, Argentina, Canada, Chile, Israel, Mexico, Peru, Saudi Arabia and South Korea Worldwide Remodulin Continuous intravenous Pulmonary arterial hypertension Commercial in the U.S., Argentina, Canada, Israel, Mexico, Peru, Saudi Arabia, South Korea and Switzerland Worldwide Tyvaso Inhaled Pulmonary arterial hypertension Commercial in the U.S. Worldwide Adcirca (tadalafil) Tablets Oral Pulmonary hypertension Commercial in the U.S. and Puerto Rico United States Puerto Rico CardioPAL SAVI and Decipher Monitors Telemedicine Cardiac arrhythmias and ischemic heart disease Commercial in the U.S. Worldwide Oral Treprostinil (UT 15C) Oral Pulmonary arterial hypertension Phase III Worldwide Ch14.18 MAb Intravenous Neuroblastoma Phase III Worldwide Beraprost MR Oral Pulmonary arterial hypertension Phase II North America Europe Oral Treprostinil Oral Peripheral vascular disease Phase II Worldwide 8H9 MAb Intravenous Metastatic brain cancer Phase I Worldwide IW001 Oral Idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis and primary graft dysfunction Phase I Worldwide Miglustat Oral Hepatitis C Pre Clinical Worldwide Other Glycobiology Antiviral Agents Oral Broad spectrum agents against viral infectious diseases Pre Clinical Worldwide We have obtained approval in 28 member countries of the European Economic Area (EEA), as well as in other European countries that are not members of the EEA. We have received formal approval letters and pricing approval in most of these countries. On February 7, 2011 we entered into an agreement to sell Medicomp, Inc., our telemedicine subsidiary, to a group of private investors, which is expected to close in March or April 2011, assuming timely receipt of regulatory approvals and satisfaction of other closing conditions. For a description of the transaction, see the section below entitled Products to Provide Telemedicine Services for Cardiac Arrhythmias and Ischemic Heart Disease . 4 Table of Contents Products to Treat Cardiopulmonary Diseases Pulmonary Arterial Hypertension PAH is a life threatening disease that affects the blood vessels in the lungs and is characterized by increased pressure in the pulmonary arteries, which are the blood vessels leading from the heart to the lungs. The elevated pressure in the pulmonary arteries strains the right side of the heart as it pumps blood to the lungs. This eventually leads to right heart failure and, ultimately, death. PAH is characterized by structural changes in blood vessel walls, aggregation of platelets and alteration of smooth muscle cell function. It is estimated that PAH affects between 100,000 and 200,000 individuals worldwide. In recent years, as awareness of PAH has grown, we have seen an increase in the number of people diagnosed with the disease. However, due to the rarity of the disease and the complexity of diagnosing it, only a small fraction of patients with PAH are being treated. There is scientific interest in identifying easier, less invasive methods of diagnosing PAH. If this research is successful, more patients could be diagnosed at an earlier stage of the disease. Currently, treatment of PAH focuses on 3 distinct molecular pathways that have been implicated in the disease process the prostacyclin pathway, the nitric oxide (NO) pathway, and the endothelin (ET) pathway. The 3 classes of drugs that target these 3 pathways are Prostacyclin Analogues. Patients with PAH have been shown to have reduced levels of prostacyclin, a naturally occurring substance that has the effect of relaxing the pulmonary blood vessels, preventing platelet aggregation, and inhibiting the proliferation of smooth muscle cells in the pulmonary vessels. Therefore, drugs that mimic the action of prostacyclin, known as prostacyclin analogues, are established PAH treatments. PDE 5 Inhibitors. Patients with PAH have also been shown to have reduced levels of the enzyme responsible for producing NO, a naturally occurring substance in the body that causes relaxation of the pulmonary blood vessels. NO produces this effect by increasing intracellular levels of an intermediary known as cyclic guanosine monophosphate (cGMP). Therefore, another established therapeutic approach has been to inhibit the degradation of cGMP, using drugs that are known as PDE 5 inhibitors. Endothelin Receptor Antagonists. PAH patients have also been shown to have elevated levels of endothelin 1, a naturally occurring substance in the body that causes constriction and structural changes of the pulmonary blood vessels. Therefore, another established therapeutic approach has been to block the action of endothelin with drugs that are known as endothelin receptor antagonists (ETRAs). Because any or all of the 3 pathways may be therapeutic targets in a patient, these 3 classes of drugs are used al1 or in combination to treat patients with PAH. We currently market drugs in 2 of these 3 classes. Remodulin and Tyvaso are prostacyclin analogues, and Adcirca is a PDE 5 inhibitor. Remodulin Our lead product for treating PAH is Remodulin (treprostinil) Injection, the main ingredient of which is a prostacyclin analogue known as treprostinil. We sell Remodulin to our specialty pharmaceutical distributors in the United States and to our international distributors at a transfer price set by us. We recognized approximately $4036 million, $3316 million and $269.7 million in Remodulin revenues, representing 67%, 90% and 96% of our net revenues for the years ended December 31, 2010, 2009 and 2008, respectively. In May 2002, Remodulin was approved by the FDA as a continuous subcutaneous infusion for the treatment of PAH in patients with New York Heart Association (NYHA) Class II IV (moderate to severe) symptoms. In November 2004, the FDA expanded its approval to permit continuous intravenous infusion of Remodulin for patients who cannot tolerate subcutaneous 5 Table of Contents infusion. In March 2006, the FDA expanded its approval to include transition of patients to Remodulin from Flolan (epoprostenol), the first FDA approved prostacyclin therapy for PAH. In January 2007, the results of a prospective, open label study demonstrated that stable patients with PAH can be safely transiti1d from Flolan to intravenous Remodulin using a rapid switch protocol. Outside of the United States, Remodulin is also approved as a continuous subcutaneous infusion treatment for various forms of PAH in 36 countries and as a continuous intravenous infusion treatment for various forms of PAH in seven countries. Applications for approval of both subcutaneous and intravenous Remodulin are under review in other countries. We continue to work toward commercializing Remodulin in new territories, including Japan and China. Flolan is delivered continuously through a surgically implanted intravenous catheter connected to an external pump. Flolan is approved for the treatment of patients with certain subsets of late stage PAH. Generic formulations of Flolan are also available. We believe subcutaneous Remodulin provides patients with a less invasive alternative to Flolan and its equivalents. In contrast to Flolan, Remodulin is stable at room temperature and lasts significantly longer inside the human body. These attributes allow for potentially safer and more convenient drug delivery to patients. Unlike Flolan, Remodulin can be delivered by subcutaneous infusion with a pager sized miniature pump. Subcutaneous delivery of Remodulin also eliminates the risk of central venous catheter infection and the hospitalization required to begin intravenous infusion. Remodulin's extended presence in the body may also reduce the risk of rebound PAH, and possibly death, if treatment is abruptly interrupted. The stability of Remodulin also allows it to be packaged as an aqueous solution, so patients do not have to mix the drug, as they do with Flolan. Remodulin can be continuously infused for up to 48 hours before refilling the infusion pump, unlike Flolan, which must be mixed and refilled every 24 hours. Treprostinil, the active ingredient in Remodulin, is highly soluble in an aqueous solution, which enables us to manufacture Remodulin in highly concentrated solutions. This allows therapeutic concentrations of Remodulin to be delivered at low flow rates via miniaturized infusion pumps for both subcutaneous and intravenous infusion. Lastly, Remodulin does not require the patient to keep the drug cool during infusion. This eliminates the need for cooling packs or refrigeration to keep it stable, as is required with Flolan due to Flolan's chemical instability at room temperature. In April 2008, Teva Pharmaceuticals Industries Ltd. (Teva) announced that the FDA approved its version of generic epoprostenol for the treatment of PAH, which has all of the attributes of Flolan discussed above. In June 2008, the FDA approved a generic version of Flolan, developed by GeneraMedix, Inc. (GeneraMedix), which is stable at room temperature but shares all of Flolan's other negative attributes including risk of central venous catheter infection, required hospitalization at the start of treatment, short half life (which increases risk of rebound PAH), mixing requirements, greater frequency of pump refills and larger pump size. In February 2009, GeneraMedix licensed the commercial rights for its generic epoprostenol to Actelion Pharmaceuticals Ltd (Actelion), marketed as Veletri . Actelion also markets Tracleer , an ETRA, and Ventavis , an inhaled prostacyclin, for the treatment of PAH. There are noteworthy adverse events associated with Remodulin. When infused subcutaneously, Remodulin causes varying degrees of infusion site pain and reaction (redness and swelling) in most patients. Patients who cannot tolerate the site pain related to use of subcutaneous Remodulin may instead use intravenous Remodulin. Intravenous Remodulin is delivered continuously by an external pump through a surgically implanted central venous catheter, similar to Flolan, Veletri and generic epoprostenol. When delivered intravenously, Remodulin bears the risk of a serious bloodstream infection known as sepsis, as do Flolan, Veletri and generic epoprostenol. 6 Table of Contents FDA Approval of Subcutaneous and Intravenous Remodulin In May 2002, the FDA approved Remodulin as a continuous subcutaneous infusion for the treatment of PAH in patients with NYHA class II IV symptoms to diminish symptoms associated with exercise. Remodulin is approved for all types of PAH and is the only prostacyclin analogue approved for patients with NYHA class II IV symptoms. In November 2004, based on data establishing intravenous Remodulin's bioequivalence with commercial subcutaneous Remodulin, the FDA approved intravenous Remodulin for those not able to tolerate subcutaneous infusion. International Regulatory Review of Subcutaneous and Intravenous Remodulin Remodulin for subcutaneous use is approved in many countries throughout the world. We used the mutual recognition process, described more fully in Governmental Regulation , to obtain approval of subcutaneous Remodulin in most countries in the European Union (EU). The mutual recognition process for subcutaneous Remodulin was completed in August 2005, with positive decisions received from most EU member countries. We withdrew our applications in the Republic of Ireland (Ireland), Spain and the United Kingdom (UK) following a request for additional documentation from these countries, and we intend to resubmit some or all of the applications if and when we achieve EU approval for intravenous Remodulin. A license variation for intravenous Remodulin was resubmitted in mid 2010, once our compulsory five year renewal application for subcutaneous Remodulin was approved. Our license variation is currently under review by our reference member state, France. We sell (but do not market) Remodulin under the named patient system in the EU member countries where Remodulin is not approved. Under the named patient system, our distributors are permitted to import Remodulin into EU member countries for sale to hospitals for use in treating specifically approved patients. Tyvaso We commenced commercial sales of Tyvaso in September 2009. We sell Tyvaso at a discount from an average wholesale price recommended by us to the same specialty pharmaceutical distributors in the United States that distribute Remodulin. For the years ended December 31, 2010 and 2009, we recognized approximately $1518 million and $20.3 million in Tyvaso revenues, representing 25% and 5%, respectively of our net revenues. We did not recognize any revenues from Tyvaso in 2008. Currently, the only other FDA approved inhaled prostacyclin analogue is Ventavis. Ventavis is marketed by Actelion in the United States and by Bayer Schering Pharma AG in Europe. The active ingredient in Ventavis, iloprost, has a half life of approximately 20 to 30 minutes and can cause a decrease in systemic blood pressure if the drug is administered at too high a dose. Patients need to inhale Ventavis six to nine times per day via a nebulizer. According to its label, each Ventavis inhalation consists of 4 to 10 minutes of continuous inhalation via the nebulizer. In contrast to iloprost, treprostinil (the active ingredient in Tyvaso) has a longer half life and greater selectivity to the lungs. Tyvaso is administered four times a day, by inhaling up to nine breaths during each 2 to 3 minute treatment session. Tyvaso is administered using the Tyvaso Inhalation System, an ultra sonic nebulizer that provides a dose of Tyvaso on a breath by breath basis. In addition, a day's supply of Tyvaso is packaged in a single ampoule emptied into the nebulizer once a day. As a result, unlike the Ventavis nebulizer which requires cleaning after each use, the Tyvaso Inhalation System only needs to be cleaned once a day. Tyvaso has been generally well tolerated in our trials, during which adverse events appeared to be similar to those previously reported for treprostinil or due to administration by inhalation. The most common adverse events were transient cough, headache, nausea, dizziness and flushing. We recently 7 Table of Contents completed an open label study in the United States to investigate the clinical effects of switching patients from Ventavis to Tyvaso, in which improvements in patient quality of life were observed. FDA Approval of Tyvaso In June 2008, we submitted a New Drug Application (NDA) to obtain FDA approval to market Tyvaso for the treatment of PAH in the United States. On July 30, 2009, the FDA approved Tyvaso for the treatment of PAH using the Tyvaso Inhalation System. Tyvaso is indicated to increase walk distance in patients with NYHA Class III symptoms of PAH, which includes multiple etiologies such as idiopathic and familial PAH, as well as PAH associated with scleroderma and congenital heart disease. In connection with the Tyvaso approval, we have agreed to a post marketing requirement (PMR) and certain post marketing commitments (PMCs). PMRs and PMCs are studies that sponsors conduct after FDA approval to gather additional information about a product's safety, efficacy, or optimal use. PMRs are required studies, whereas a sponsor voluntarily commits to conduct PMCs. We are required to provide the FDA annual updates on our PMR and PMCs. Failure to complete the studies or adhere to the timelines set by the FDA for the PMR could result in penalties, including fines or withdrawal of Tyvaso from the market, unless we are able to demonstrate good cause for not completing the studies or adhering to our timelines. In accordance with our PMR, we recently commenced patient enrollment in a long term observational study in the U.S. that will include 1,000 patient years of follow up in patients treated with Tyvaso, and 1,000 patient years of follow up in control patients receiving other PAH treatments. This study will allow us to continue to assess the safety of Tyvaso. We are currently required to submit the results of the study by December 15, 2013, but we have requested an extension of this timeline. The PMCs require us to modify particular aspects of the Tyvaso Inhalation System. As part of these modifications, we agreed to perform a usability analysis incorporating the evaluation and prioritization of user related risk followed by a human factors study. We submitted proposed device modifications to the FDA in accordance with the PMCs and completed the related human factors study. The FDA has requested further modifications to the device and a follow up usability study once these additional modifications are complete. As a result of the request to make further modifications to the device and to perform a follow up usability study, we have requested an extension to the original October 31, 2010 timeline for completion of the PMCs. Our request is under review by the FDA. In June 2010, the FDA granted orphan drug designation for Tyvaso. Such a designation, coupled with an approval of the product for the orphan indication, confers an exclusivity period during which the FDA may not approve any application to market the same drug for the same indication, except in limited circumstances. We are also working with Medtronic, Inc. on demonstrating the safety of its Synchromed II implantable infusion pump for intravenous Remodulin, and are planning to begin enrolling a clinical trial in April 2011 In Europe, another manufacturer's implantable pump is occasionally used to deliver intravenous Remodulin. International Regulatory Review of Tyvaso In April 2004, the European Medicines Agency (EMA) designated Tyvaso an orphan medicinal product for the treatment of both PAH and chronic thromboembolic pulmonary hypertension. The EMA orphan designation confers a ten year exclusivity period commencing with marketing approval. We filed a Marketing Authorization Application (MAA) in December 2008 for Tyvaso and the Tyvaso Inhalation System with the EMA using the centralized filing process. See Governmental Regulation below for further discussion on the centralized filing process for the EU. In February 2010, we withdrew our MAA from consideration by the EMA due to the EMA's major objection related to 8 Table of Contents findings of non compliance with good clinical practice (GCP) at 2 clinical sites. The EMA stated that these findings would preclude a recommendation for approval of Tyvaso in the EU. The EMA had no major objections at the time of withdrawal related to the safety or efficacy of Tyvaso. We are currently working with the EMA on the design of another study acceptable for filing of an MAA in Europe. Adcirca We began commercial sales of Adcirca in July 2009. Adcirca is a PDE 5 inhibitor, the active pharmaceutical ingredient of which is tadalafil. Tadalafil is also the active pharmaceutical ingredient in Cialis , which is marketed by Lilly for the treatment of erectile dysfunction. We acquired the commercial rights to Adcirca for the treatment of PAH in the U.S. from Lilly in November 2008. We sell Adcirca at a discount from an average wholesale price to pharmaceutical wholesalers. For the years ended December 31, 2010 and 2009, we recognized approximately $36.3 million and $5.8 million in Adcirca revenues, representing 6% and 2%, respectively, of our net revenues. We did not recognize any revenues from Adcirca in 2008. Patients with PAH have been shown to have reduced levels of the enzyme responsible for producing NO, a naturally occurring substance in the body that has the effect of relaxing vascular smooth muscle cells. Impaired blood vessel relaxation in penile tissue is also a cause of erectile dysfunction. NO works to relax pulmonary blood vessels by increasing intracellular levels of an intermediary known as cyclic GMP. Because cyclic GMP is degraded by PDE 5, an established therapeutic approach in the treatment of PAH is to use PDE 5 inhibitors to increase levels of cGMP in blood vessels and improve cardiopulmonary function in PAH patients. Prior to the approval of Adcirca, Revatio, which is marketed by Pfizer Inc. (Pfizer) was the only PDE 5 inhibitor approved for the treatment of PAH. Sildenafil, the active ingredient in Revatio, is also the active ingredient in Viagra , which is marketed by Pfizer for the treatment of erectile dysfunction. Revatio is dosed 3 times daily; in contrast, patients take Adcirca only once daily. FDA Approval of Adcirca In May 2009, the FDA approved Adcirca, with a recommended dose of 40 mg, making it the first once daily PDE 5 inhibitor for the treatment of PAH. Adcirca is indicated to improve exercise ability in World Health Organization Group I PAH patients, which encompasses patients with multiple forms of PAH including etiologies such as idiopathic and familial PAH as well as PAH associated with collagen vascular disease and congenital heart disease. Commercial Rights to Adcirca In December 2008, we completed the transactions contemplated by several agreements we entered into with Lilly and 1 of its subsidiaries in November 2008, including a license agreement, a manufacturing and supply agreement and a stock purchase agreement. Pursuant to the license agreement, Lilly granted us an exclusive license for the right to develop, market, promote and commercialize Adcirca for the treatment of pulmonary hypertension in the United States and Puerto Rico. Pursuant to the manufacturing and supply agreement, Lilly agreed to manufacture Adcirca and distribute it on our behalf via its wholesaler ne2rk, in the same manner that it distributes its own pharmaceutical products. In December 2008, upon closing, we made a 1 time, non refundable, non creditable payment of $125.0 million under the manufacturing and supply agreement and a 1 time payment of $25.0 million under the license agreement. Pursuant to the stock purchase agreement, Lilly purchased 6,301,674 shares of our common stock (adjusted for our September 2009 2 for 1 stock split) for an aggregate purchase price of $150.0 million. We issued those shares from treasury. See Strategic Licenses and Relationships below for more details on these agreements. 9 Table of Contents UT 15C Sustained Release (Oral Treprostinil) Pulmonary Arterial Hypertension We are developing a novel salt form of treprostinil for oral administration. We use technology licensed from Supernus Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (Supernus) to provide for sustained release of treprostinil in tablets. The tablet coating technology allows for treprostinil to be released into the body through an extremely small hole that is laser drilled into the coating of each tablet. This technology releases treprostinil at a relatively even rate in the gastrointestinal tract. In 2005, a Phase I study of healthy volunteers demonstrated that the formulation and coating provided sustained blood concentrations of treprostinil for 8 to 10 hours following a single oral dose. This duration may allow for twice daily dosing. In July 2005, the EMA announced that oral treprostinil had been designated an orphan medicinal product for the treatment of PAH. In December 2006, we commenced 2 Phase III multi national, placebo controlled clinical trials of oral treprostinil in patients with PAH to study both safety and efficacy. The FREEDOM C trial was a 16 week study of patients on approved background therapy using a PDE 5 inhibitor, such as Revatio, or an ETRA, such as Tracleer, or a combination of both. The FREEDOM M trial is a 12 week study of patients who are not on any background therapy. These trials have been conducted at a total of approximately 60 centers throughout the United States and the rest of the world. We commenced both trials using a 1 mg tablet, but during the open label extension trial (and associated pharmacokinetic substudy) we discovered that treprostinil concentrations were higher in PAH patients than in healthy individuals due to the difference in overall absorption, metabolism and excretion of the drug between these 2 populations. These differences led to a number of discontinuations by patients randomized to receive the drug due to tolerability related side effects, including nausea, jaw pain and headaches. As a result, we introduced a 0.5 mg tablet in July 2007 and a 0.25 mg tablet in April 2008 to enable more gradual dose titration in order to increase dosing to a tolerable level. In November 2008, we announced that the FREEDOM C trial did not meet statistical significance for its primary endpoint. Analysis suggests that the inability to dose titrate was a limiting factor that suppressed the overall treatment effect. Of the 174 patients who received the active drug, 25 patients discontinued due to an adverse event and 33 patients completed the trial, but were unable to titrate their doses above 1 mg twice daily. Accordingly, 58 (33%) of the patients in the active treatment group were only able to maintain a suboptimal dose of 1 mg or less twice daily. Adverse events that led to discontinuation or inability to dose escalate included headache, nausea and vomiting. Discontinuations were most common in patients who only had access to the 1 mg tablets during the study, which was the only tablet size available when the trial began. There were no discontinuations among patients who had access to 0.25 mg tablets. Analysis of other secondary efficacy measures demonstrated statistically significant improvements compared to placebo. Enrollment in FREEDOM M was initially closed on October 31, 2008, with 171 patients enrolled in the trial. We believe that the results of the FREEDOM C clinical trial, particularly as they relate to treatment effect and dosing, support our continued development of oral treprostinil. Accordingly, based on our observations from the FREEDOM C clinical trial relating to patient tolerability and tablet strength, we submitted a protocol amendment to the FDA in February 2009 to add patients to the ongoing FREEDOM M trial. These additional patients were provided access to a lower strength tablet (0.25 mg) when they began the trial and their doses were titrated in 0.25 mg increments in order to improve tolerability. In addition, our amendment to the FREEDOM M protocol specified that the primary statistical analysis of the trial will include only those patients who had access to the 0.25 mg tablet when they started the trial. We hope these protocol amendments will achieve the following objectives (1) to assess more accurately the effectiveness of oral treprostinil; (2) to improve patient tolerability of oral treprostinil so that an effective maintenance dose can be attained; and (3) to reduce 10 Table of Contents the rate of premature discontinuation due to adverse events. We believe the results of the protocol amendment will reflect the benefits of a favorable dosing regimen for oral treprostinil. On January 31, 2011, we completed enrollment of the FREEDOM M trial under the amended protocol with 349 patients, compared to target enrollment of 315 patients. We expect to unblind and announce preliminary analysis of the FREEDOM M trial results in June 2011 We commenced a second Phase III clinical trial, FREEDOM C 2 , to continue studying dosage and efficacy of oral treprostinil in PAH patients on an approved background therapy. Enrollment in FREEDOM C 2 began in June 2009. In FREEDOM C 2 , patients are provided access to a lower strength tablet (0.25 mg) and doses are being titrated in 0.25 mg to 0.5 mg increments. We estimate that this trial will be fully enrolled in April 2011, in which case we expect to unblind and announce preliminary analysis of the trial in September 2011 We have also introduced a 0.125 mg tablet so that if necessary patients can begin treatment on an even lower strength tablet, and titrate doses in smaller increments, for both FREEDOM C 2 and FREEDOM M. Currently, we do not anticipate filing an NDA for oral treprostinil until 2012 There are currently no approved oral prostacyclin therapies available to patients in the United States or Europe. If we are successful in developing oral treprostinil, then patients and physicians may use prostacyclin earlier in the PAH disease continuum, which could increase demand for our PAH therapies. Scleroderma We are undertaking a Phase II study to investigate the effectiveness of oral treprostinil in reducing the frequency and severity of digital ulcers associated with scleroderma. Enrollment of this Phase II trial has been completed at 148 patients, and we expect to unblind and announce the preliminary results of this trial in the first half of 2011 Beraprost MR In June 2000, we entered into an agreement with Toray Industries, Inc. (Toray) for the exclusive right to develop and market a sustained release formulation of beraprost (beraprost SR) in the United States and Canada for the treatment of cardiovascular indications. Beraprost is a chemically stable, orally bioavailable prostacyclin analogue. Like natural prostacyclin and Remodulin, beraprost is believed to dilate blood vessels, prevent platelet aggregation and prevent proliferation of smooth muscle cells surrounding blood vessels. In March 2007, Lung Rx entered into an amended agreement with Toray to assume and amend the rights and obligations of our June 2000 agreement with Toray concerning the commercialization of a modified release formulation of beraprost (beraprost MR). The amended agreement grants us additional exclusive rights to commercialize beraprost MR in Europe and broadens the treatment indication to include vascular disease (excluding renal disease), among other revisions. In October 2007, Toray announced that beraprost MR received regulatory approval in Japan for use in the treatment of PAH. Idiopathic Pulmonary Fibrosis and Primary Graft Dysfunction Collagen Type V In February 2010, Lung Rx entered into a Development Agreement with ImmuneWorks, Inc. (ImmuneWorks) to develop IW001, a purified bovine (derived from cows) Type V Collagen oral solution for the treatment of Idiopathic Pulmonary Fibrosis (IPF), a progressive lung disease characterized by abnormal and excessive deposition of fibrotic tissue in the lung, and Primary Graft 11 Table of Contents Dysfunction (PGD), a type of organ rejection in patients receiving lung transplant. Human clinical testing of IW001 has commenced and a Phase I clinical trial in patients with IPF is ongoing. In connection with entering into the development program, Lung Rx was granted an option to acquire all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of ImmuneWorks. In November 2009, the FDA granted IW001 orphan drug exclusivity. Products to Treat Cancer Ch14.18 Antibody In July 2010, we entered into a Cooperative Research and Development Agreement (CRADA) with the National Cancer Institute (NCI) to collaborate on the late stage development and regulatory agency submissions of Chimeric Monoclonal Antibody 14.18 (Ch14.18) for children with high risk neuroblastoma and patients with other cancers. Neuroblastoma is a rare cancer of the sympathetic nervous system mainly affecting children. It is the most common extracranial, outside the skull, solid cancer in children and the most common cancer in infants. There are fewer than 1,000 new cases of neuroblastoma diagnosed each year. Ch14.18 is a chimeric, composed of a combination of mouse and human DNA, monoclonal antibody that induces antibody dependent cell mediated cytotoxicity, a mechanism of cell mediated immunity whereby the immune system actively targets a cell that has been bound by specific antibodies. Under the terms of the CRADA, NCI will conduct a clinical trial in approximately 100 patients to define more clearly the safety and toxicity profile of Ch14.18 immunotherapy in children and we will develop the commercial manufacturing capability for the antibody. As part of developing our commercial manufacturing capability, we will need to demonstrate comparability of our Ch14.18 to the NCI produced Ch14.18, which typically includes a series of analytical and bioanalytical assays and human pharmacokinetics. The NCI studies, including the previously conducted Phase III study and all other studies supported by NCI, will be used in support of a Biologics License Application seeking FDA approval of Ch14.18 immunotherapy for the treatment of neuroblastoma. 3F8 and 8H9 Antibodies In December 2007, we entered into 2 agreements with Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center (MSKCC) to license certain exclusive rights to 2 investigational monoclonal antibodies, 3F8 and 8H9, for the treatment of neuroblastoma and metastatic brain cancer, respectively. The monoclonal antibody 3F8 is a mouse IgG3 MAb, which is currently used in an investigational setting for the treatment of neuroblastoma. In August 2009, we began enrolling patients in a Phase II clinical trial of 3F8 for primary refractory neuroblastoma. However, after we entered into the CRADA relating to the Ch14.18 antibody with the NCI in 2010, we stopped further development of the 3F8 program in the fourth quarter of 2010 and returned the rights to 3F8 to MSKCC. The monoclonal antibody 8H9 is a mouse IgG1 MAb that is highly reactive with a range of human solid tumors, including human brain cancers. The 8H9 antibody is in early investigational development for metastases that develop in the brain from the spread of cancers from other tissues in the body. Metastatic brain cancers are ten times more common than cancers that originate in the brain, and prognosis for patients with metastatic brain cancers is very poor. In the United States, more than 100,000 cases of metastatic brain cancer are diagnosed each year. Products to Treat Infectious Diseases Glycobiology Antiviral Agents We have a license agreement with the Glycobiology Institute at the University of Oxford for the exclusive worldwide rights to certain patents relating to novel antiviral compounds. These glycobiology antiviral compounds are small molecules that may be effective as oral therapies for the treatment of hepatitis B and C infections, and may also be effective generally as broad spectrum antiviral agents. Currently, many of these compounds are undergoing laboratory testing, and new compounds are also being synthesized. 12 Table of Contents Products to Provide Telemedicine Services for Cardiac Arrhythmias and Ischemic Heart Disease CardioPAL SAVI and Decipher Recorders We provide telemedicine monitoring services to detect cardiac arrhythmias and ischemic heart disease through our wholly owned subsidiary Medicomp, Inc. (Medicomp), which we acquired in December 2000. Medicomp provides cardiac Holter monitoring (a 24 hour continuous test of heart rhythms), event monitoring (a test that typically extends to 30 days and looks for more elusive, intermittent arrhythmias) and other cardiac monitoring services remotely via teleph1 and the internet for hospitals, clinicians and other providers. Medicomp's services are delivered through its proprietary, miniaturized, digital Decipher Holter recorder analyzer and its CardioPAL family of event monitors. Holter and event services and systems are marketed to physicians, hospitals, and managed care providers directly by Medicomp's sales force. In March 2005, Medicomp received FDA market clearance for a p wave analysis in addition to its artificial intelligence algorithm that runs on all of its newly manufactured CardioPAL devices. The p wave is a diminutive but important portion of the electrocardiograph, the analysis of which helps determine if an arrhythmia was generated from the top chambers of the heart, the atria, or from the bottom chambers of the heart, the ventricles. This level of analysis leads to more reliable, automatic detection of arrhythmias, like atrial fibrillation. In October 2009, Medicomp received FDA approval for a wireless version of the CardioPAL SAVI event monitor, which was commercially launched in 2010. On February 7, 2011, we entered into an agreement and plan of merger to sell Medicomp to a group of private investors including Medicomp's current president. As Medicomp does not represent a core comp1nt of our business, its sale will allow us to devote more resources to our principal operations. Upon closing of the merger, we will receive aggregate consideration of $14.9 million, consisting of approximately $30 million in cash and or shares of United Therapeutics common stock held by the investors, and an $119 million, ten year promissory note to be issued by Medicomp at closing. The promissory note will bear interest at 5.0 percent per annum. Closing of this transaction is subject to customary closing conditions and regulatory approvals, and assuming timely receipt of these approvals closing will occur in March or April 2011 Upon closing of the sale, we will acquire a 19.9 percent ownership interest in Medicomp in exchange for $10 million in cash and a reduction in the face value of the promissory note by approximately $20 million. Additionally, we obtained royalty free license rights to use Medicomp's proprietary detection technology to develop and commercialize a smart ph1 based arrhythmia detection application for patients in the individual consumer market. In connection with entering into the merger agreement, we recognized an impairment charge of $6.2 million representing the write off of the carrying value of Medicomp's goodwill as of December 31, 2010. The impairment charge has been included in selling, general and administrative expenses for the year ended December 31, 2010. For further details, see Note 20 Subsequent Event to our consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. We recognized revenues of approximately $10.9 million, $110 million and $9.5 million from the sales of telemedicine products and services in 2010, 2009 and 2008, respectively. Sales and Marketing Our marketing strategy for our commercial products is to use our sales and marketing teams to reach out to the prescriber community to (1) increase PAH awareness; (2) increase understanding of the progressive nature of PAH; and (3) increase awareness of our commercial products and how they fit into the various stages of disease progression and treatment. The sales and marketing team consisted of approximately 113 employees as of December 31, 2010. We have divided our domestic sales force into 2 teams. 1 team sells Remodulin and Tyvaso, while the other team sells Adcirca. The efforts 13 Table of Contents of our sales and marketing teams are supplemented in the United States by our specialty pharmaceutical distributors for Remodulin and Tyvaso. Our U.S. distributors are experienced in all aspects of using and administering chronic therapies, as well as patient care, the sale and distribution of these medicines and reimbursement from insurance companies and other payers. Outside of the United States, we have entered into distribution agreements for Remodulin covering many territories worldwide. We are working with our current distributors to expand Remodulin sales into other countries in which they have distribution rights. Domestic Distribution of Commercial Products Remodulin and Tyvaso We have entered into separate, non exclusive distribution agreements with CuraScript, Inc. (CuraScript), Accredo Health Group, Inc. (Accredo), and CVS Caremark (Caremark), our specialty pharmaceutical distributors in the United States, to market, promote and distribute both Remodulin and Tyvaso. Our Remodulin distribution agreements with Accredo and Caremark include automatic term renewals for additional 1 year periods subject to notice of termination. Our Remodulin distribution agreement with CuraScript contains automatic term renewals for additional 2 year periods subject to notice of termination. We entered into our distribution agreements for Tyvaso in August 2009. Our Tyvaso distribution agreements have 1 year terms and renew automatically for additional 1 year periods, unless terminated earlier. We update our distribution agreements from time to time to reflect changes in the regulatory environment. Such changes have not had a significant impact on our operations or our relationships with our distributors, and tend to occur in the ordinary course of business. For specific services requested by us, we compensate our distributors on a fee for service basis as set forth in our distribution agreements. If any of our distribution agreements expire or terminate, we may, under certain circumstances, be required to repurchase any unsold Remodulin or Tyvaso inventory held by our distributors. N1 of our current agreements grants our distributors the distribution rights for oral treprostinil in the United States. Our specialty pharmaceutical distributors are responsible for assisting patients with obtaining reimbursement for the cost of Remodulin and Tyvaso and providing other support services. Under our distribution agreements, we sell Remodulin and Tyvaso to our distributors at a discount from an average wholesale price recommended by us. We have also established a patient assistance program in the United States, which provides eligible uninsured or under insured patients with Remodulin and Tyvaso at no charge for a certain period of time. In March and April of 2010, we increased the price on all concentrations of Remodulin sold to our U.S. based and international distributors by 9.6 percent and 133 percent, respectively. In addition, we increased the price of Tyvaso by 4.9 percent in November 2010 to offset the increasing cost of manufacture and distribution. Our Remodulin distribution agreements do not allow our distributors to preorder inventory prior to a price increase. The impact of these price increases was a $25.9 million increase in our revenues, of which, $25.6 million related to sales of Remodulin for the year ended December 31, 2010. Adcirca We sell Adcirca to pharmaceutical wholesalers at a discount from an average wholesale price. Under our manufacturing and supply agreement with Lilly, (see Strategic Licenses and Relationships below for more details), Lilly has agreed to manufacture Adcirca and distribute it via its wholesaler ne2rk, which includes our specialty pharmaceutical distributors, in the same manner that it distributes its own pharmaceutical products. Under the terms of this agreement, we take title to Adcirca upon completion of its manufacture by Lilly. Adcirca is shipped to customers in accordance with purchase orders received by Lilly. When customers take delivery of Adcirca, Lilly sends an invoice and collects 14 Table of Contents the amount due from the customer subject to customary discounts and rebates, if any. Although Lilly provides these services on our behalf, we maintain the risk of loss as it pertains to inventory and non payment of invoices. The manufacturing and supply agreement will continue in effect until expiration or termination of the license agreement. In January 2011, Lilly notified us of its decision to increase the wholesale price of Adcirca by approximately 9.0 percent. International Distribution of Remodulin We currently sell subcutaneous and intravenous Remodulin outside the United States to five distributors, each of which has exclusive distribution rights in 1 or more countries within Europe, Israel and the Middle East, Asia and South and Central America. We also distribute Remodulin in Canada through a specialty pharmaceutical wholesaler. In some of the European markets where we are not licensed to market Remodulin, we sell (but do not market) Remodulin under the named patient system in which therapies are approved for individual patients by a national medical review board on a case by case basis. We are working on expanding our sales of subcutaneous and intravenous Remodulin into new territories outside of the United States through our existing distributors and by creating relationships with new distributors. In March 2007 and June 2010, we entered into distribution agreements with Mochida Pharmaceutical Co., Ltd. (Mochida) and Lee's Pharmaceutical (HK) Limited (Lee's Pharma) to obtain approval and exclusively distribute subcutaneous and intravenous Remodulin in Japan and China, respectively. Mochida is conducting an open label Phase III study to support a New Drug Application for subcutaneous and intravenous Remodulin in Japan, which we anticipate will be filed during 2011 In addition, Grupo Ferrer Internacional, S.A. (Grupo Ferrer) has been actively working toward commencing commercial sales of Remodulin in Taiwan and recently launched Remodulin in South Korea. In order to commercialize Remodulin in certain countries, such as Japan, we may be required to conduct new clinical trials, called bridging studies, to demonstrate the efficacy and safety of a drug in their local patient population prior to approval. Therefore it could take several years before we can commence commercial sales in these countries. Strategic Licenses and Relationships Lilly Agreements Related to Adcirca In December 2008, we completed the transactions contemplated by several agreements we entered into in November 2008 with Lilly, including a license agreement, a manufacturing and supply agreement, and a stock purchase agreement. License Agreement. Under the terms of the license agreement, which is more fully described below in Patents and Proprietary Rights Lilly License , Lilly granted us an exclusive license for the right to develop, market, promote and commercialize Adcirca for the treatment of pulmonary hypertension in the United States and Puerto Rico. If in the future Lilly seeks to grant rights to a third party to develop or commercialize Adcirca for the treatment of pulmonary hypertension in any other country (excluding Japan), the license agreement provides that we will have a right of first negotiation to acquire those rights. The license agreement will continue in effect until the later of (1) expiration, lapse, cancellation, abandonment or invalidation of the last claim to expire within a Lilly patent covering the commercialization of Adcirca for the treatment of pulmonary hypertension in the United States and Puerto Rico; or (2) expiration of any government conferred exclusivity rights to use Adcirca for the treatment of pulmonary hypertension in the United States and Puerto Rico. We have the right to terminate the license agreement upon six months written notice to Lilly. Either party may terminate the license agreement upon a material breach by the other party of it or the manufacturing and supply agreement, described below. 15 Table of Contents Manufacturing and Supply Agreement. Under the terms of the manufacturing and supply agreement, Lilly agreed to manufacture Adcirca and distribute it on our behalf via its pharmaceutical wholesaler ne2rk, in the same manner that it distributes its own pharmaceutical products. Under the terms of this agreement, we take title to Adcirca upon its manufacture by Lilly. Adcirca is shipped to customers, generally pharmaceutical wholesalers, in accordance with customers' purchase orders received by Lilly. Lilly invoices and collects amounts due from the customer subject to customary discounts and rebates, if any, and remits the collections to us. Although Lilly is providing these services on our behalf, we maintain the risk of loss as it pertains to inventory and nonpayment of sales invoices. The manufacturing and supply agreement will continue in effect until expiration or termination of the license agreement. As consideration for Lilly's agreement to manufacture and supply Adcirca, we made a non refundable payment to Lilly of $125.0 million in December 2008, which was expensed. We also agreed to purchase Adcirca at a fixed manufacturing cost. The agreement provides a mechanism, generally related to the increase in the national cost of pharmaceutical manufacturing, in which Lilly may raise the manufacturing cost of Adcirca. Stock Purchase Agreement. Under the terms of the stock purchase agreement, on December 18, 2008, we issued 6,301,674 shares of our common stock to Lilly from treasury for an aggregate purchase price of $150.0 million, representing approximately 136% of the then current outstanding shares of our common stock. The shares were issued at a price of $23805 per share (adjusted for our September 2009 stock split), representing 90% of the average closing price of our common stock for the five trading days commencing on and including November 17, 2008. The weighted average acquisition price of the treasury stock issued was $26.02 per share. In September 2010, Lilly filed with the SEC a Form 4 (Statement of Changes in Beneficial Ownership) disclosing that it had entered into forward contracts to sell up to an aggregate of approximately 31 million shares of United Therapeutics common stock during 2011 According to the Form 4, the settlement dates for these forward contracts are July 7, 2011, October 5, 2011 and December 28, 2011 Toray Amended License Agreement In June 2000, we licensed from Toray the exclusive right to develop and market in the United States and Canada beraprost SR, a chemically stable oral prostacyclin analogue in a sustained release formulation, for the treatment of cardiovascular indications. In March 2007, Lung Rx entered into an amended agreement with Toray to assume and amend the rights and obligations of our June 2000 agreement concerning the commercialization of beraprost MR, a modified release formulation of beraprost. The amended agreement grants us additional exclusive rights to commercialize beraprost MR in Europe and broadens the indication to vascular disease (excluding renal disease), among other revisions. In accordance with the terms of the amended agreement, in March 2007 we issued 400,000 shares of our common stock to Toray in exchange for the cancellation of Toray's existing right under the original agreement to receive an option grant to purchase 1,000,000 shares of our common stock. Under the terms of the amended agreement, Toray has the right to request that we repurchase the 400,000 shares of our common stock upon 30 days prior written notice at the price of $27.205 per share (share based numbers and prices are adjusted for our September 2009 2 for 1 stock split), which was the average closing price of our common stock between January 11, 2007, and February 23, 2007. In accordance with the provisions of the Financial Accounting Standards Board Accounting Standards Codification (FASB ASC) 815, Derivatives Hedging , and Accounting Series Release No. 268, Presentation in Financial Statements of Redeemable Preferred Stocks these shares of our common stock are reflected in mezzanine equity as common stock subject to repurchase valued at the repurchase price. If Toray requests that we repurchase these shares, then we will reclassify an amount equal to the repurchase price as a liability until the repurchase is completed. 16 Table of Contents The amended agreement also specifies that we make certain milest1 payments to Toray during the development period and upon U.S. or EU regulatory approval. In September 2010, we entered into a supplement to our license agreement with Toray under which we agreed on the timing of 2 of the milest1 payments under our existing agreement, in the amounts of $4.0 million and $5.0 million. All conditions relating to these milest1 payments were satisfied in the fourth quarter of 2010; accordingly, during the quarter we paid Toray $4.0 million and recognized a $5.0 million liability and associated expense relating to the second milest1 payment, which will be paid to Toray during the first quarter of 2011 Although the second milest1 payment is not due until the first quarter of 2011, we accrued and expensed the payment in 2010 because the contingencies affecting this milest1 payment were removed during the fourth quarter of 2010. These milest1 payments were expensed as research and development when incurred since beraprost MR has not demonstrated commercial feasibility. NEBU TEC Agreement of Sale and Transfer In December 2008, we entered into an agreement with NEBU TEC, to purchase its line of business relating to the manufacture of the Tyvaso Inhalation System for 5.0 million plus future milest1 payments of up to 10.0 million (of which we have already paid 10 million). The transaction closed in September 2009 after we received FDA approval for Tyvaso. Under the terms of our agreement, we purchase the device comp1nts and manage the manufacturing process for the Tyvaso Inhalation System, and NEBU TEC supplies the labor to assemble the devices. NEBU TEC also granted us an option to acquire its next generation inhalation device, the SIM Neb, which is currently under development. ImmuneWorks Development Agreement In February 2010, Lung Rx entered into a Development Agreement with ImmuneWorks, Inc. to develop IW001, a purified bovine (derived from cows) Type V Collagen oral solution for the treatment of Idiopathic Pulmonary Fibrosis (IPF), a progressive lung disease characterized by abnormal and excessive deposition of fibrotic tissue in the lung, and Primary Graft Dysfunction (PGD), a type of organ rejection in patients receiving lung transplant. Human clinical testing of IW001 has commenced and a Phase I clinical trial in patients with IPF is ongoing. In connection with entering into the development program, Lung Rx was granted an option to acquire all of the issued and outstanding capital stock of ImmuneWorks. In November 2009, the FDA granted IW001 orphan drug exclusivity. Patents and Proprietary Rights Our success depends in part on our ability to obtain and maintain patent protection for our products, preserve trade secrets, prevent third parties from infringing upon our proprietary rights and operate without infringing upon the proprietary rights of others in the United States and worldwide. Glaxo Assignment In January 1997, GlaxoSmithKline PLC (formerly Glaxo Wellcome, Inc.) (Glaxo) assigned to us all rights to the use of the stable prostacyclin analogue now known as treprostinil, the active ingredient in Remodulin, Tyvaso and our oral treprostinil tablet. The patent covering the use of treprostinil for PAH expires in the United States in October 2014 (as extended see Patent Term Extensions below) and on various dates from May 2011 to June 2014 in 3 other countries. Pfizer License In December 1996, Pharmacia & Upjohn Company (now Pfizer) exclusively licensed to us certain patents, a patent application and know how for the composition and production of treprostinil. We filed 17 Table of Contents our own patent application for a new synthesis and production method for treprostinil in October 1997 in the United States, Europe and various other countries. This application resulted in the grant of 3 patents in the United States, all of which expire in October 2017, as well as 1 patent in Europe and 1 patent in Japan, both expiring in October 2018. The application remains pending in other countries. We believe that our method of synthesis is a substantial improvement over the Pharmacia method, and we are using our unique synthesis method rather than the licensed Pharmacia method for the production of treprostinil. We continue to conduct research into new methods to synthesize treprostinil and have 2 registered patents in the United States that expire in 2021, as well as additional United States and foreign pending patent applications, relating to such methods. Lilly License In November 2008, we entered into a license agreement with Lilly pursuant to which Lilly granted us the exclusive right to develop, market, promote and commercialize Adcirca for the treatment of pulmonary hypertension in the United States and Puerto Rico. In exchange for the license, we paid Lilly a non refundable fee of $25.0 million in December 2008, which was expensed since Adcirca had not yet received regulatory approval for commercial sales. We also agreed to pay Lilly royalties equal to 5 percent of our net sales of Adcirca in the United States and Puerto Rico, as a pass through of Lilly's third party royalty obligations, for so long as Lilly is required to make such payments. Lilly retained the exclusive rights to develop, manufacture and commercialize pharmaceutical products containing tadalafil, the active pharmaceutical ingredient in Adcirca, for the treatment of pulmonary hypertension outside of the United States and Puerto Rico and for the treatment of other diseases worldwide. Lilly will retain authority for all regulatory activities with respect to Adcirca, including retail pricing, which is expected to be at price parity with Cialis, Lilly's therapy for the treatment of erectile dysfunction, the active ingredient of which is also tadalafil. If in the future Lilly seeks to grant rights to a third party to develop or commercialize Adcirca for the treatment of pulmonary hypertension in any other country (excluding Japan), the license agreement provides that we will have a right of first negotiation to acquire those rights. The license agreement will continue in effect until the later of (1) expiration, lapse, cancellation, abandonment or invalidation of the last claim to expire within a Lilly patent covering the commercialization of Adcirca for the treatment of pulmonary hypertension in the United States and Puerto Rico; or (2) expiration of any government conferred exclusivity rights to use Adcirca for the treatment of pulmonary hypertension in the United States and Puerto Rico. We have the right to terminate the license agreement upon six months written notice to Lilly. Either party may terminate upon a material breach by the other party of the license agreement or the manufacturing and supply agreement, described above. Supernus Pharmaceutical License In June 2006, we entered into an exclusive license agreement with Supernus to use certain of its technologies in our sustained release oral treprostinil tablet. Under the agreement, in return for the license, we will pay Supernus certain amounts upon the achievement of specified milest1s based on the development of oral treprostinil and its commercial launch. In addition, the agreement provides that we will pay a royalty to Supernus based on net worldwide sales of the initial product. Any such royalty will be paid for approximately twelve years commencing with the first product sale and is subject to adjustments as specified in the agreement. Additional milest1 payments and royalty payments may be due for the development and commercialization of other products developed using the technology granted under this license. 18 Table of Contents National Cancer Institute In July 2010, we entered into a CRADA with NCI to collaborate on the late stage development and regulatory agency submissions of Chimeric Monoclonal Antibody 14.18 (Ch14.18) for children with high risk neuroblastoma and patients with other cancers. Neuroblastoma is a rare cancer of the sympathetic nervous system mainly affecting children. Under the terms of the CRADA, NCI will conduct a clinical trial in approximately 100 patients to define more clearly the safety and toxicity profile of Ch14.18 immunotherapy in children and we will develop the commercial manufacturing capability for the antibody. As part of developing our commercial manufacturing capability, we will need to demonstrate comparability of our Ch14.18 to the NCI produced Ch14.18, which typically includes a series of analytical and bioanalytical assays and human pharmacokinetics. The NCI studies, including the previously conducted Phase III study and all other studies supported by NCI will be used in support of a Biologics License Application seeking FDA approval of Ch14.18 immunotherapy for the treatment of neuroblastoma. Memorial Sloan Kettering License In December 2007, we entered into 2 agreements with MSKCC to exclusively license certain rights to 2 investigational monoclonal antibodies, 3F8 and 8H9, for the treatment of neuroblastoma and metastatic brain cancer, respectively. The monoclonal antibody 3F8 is a mouse IgG3 MAb, which is currently used in an investigational setting for the treatment of neuroblastoma. However, after we entered into the CRADA relating to the Ch14.18 antibody with the NCI in 2010, we stopped further development of the 3F8 program in the fourth quarter of 2010 and terminated our license with MSKCC relating to 3F8. 8H9 is also a mouse monoclonal antibody, but of the IgG1 subclass. The 8H9 antibody is highly reactive with a range of human solid tumors, including brain cancers. The 8H9 antibody is in early investigational development for the treatment of metastatic brain cancer. Under the terms of our agreement, MSKCC granted us an exclusive license for the development and commercialization of the 8H9 antibody for cancer throughout the universe. In exchange for this exclusive license, we agreed to pay a royalty fee on net sales, with an annual minimum royalty payment. Milest1 payments may also be due for the development and commercialization of 8H9 under our license. Patent Term Extensions In February 2005, we were granted a five year patent term extension by the United States Patent and Trademark Office for a patent covering the method of treating PAH using Remodulin and Tyvaso. U.S. Patent Number 5,153,222, entitled "Method of Treating Pulmonary Hypertension with Benzidine Prostaglandins", was originally scheduled to expire on October 6, 2009. It will now expire on October 6, 2014. The five year Hatch Waxman Act extension is the maximum extension allowed under 35 U.S.C. 156. Additional patents covering other products to which we have rights may also be eligible for extensions of up to five years based upon patent term restoration procedures under the Hatch Waxman Act in the United States, and under similar procedures in Europe. The FDA has granted Tyvaso an orphan designation, which will result in orphan exclusivity through July 2016. Research & Development Expenditures We are engaged in research and development and have incurred substantial expenses for these activities. These expenses generally include the cost of acquiring or inventing new technologies and products, as well as, new product development. Research and development expenses during 2010, 2009 and 2008 totaled approximately $166.8 million, $1222 million and $239.2 million, respectively. See Item 7 Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations Major 19 Table of Contents Research and Development Projects for additional information regarding expenditures related to major research and development projects. Manufacturing and Supply We make treprostinil, the active ingredient for Remodulin and Tyvaso, and treprostinil diethanolamine, the active ingredient for oral treprostinil, at our facility in Silver Spring, Maryland. In June 2009, the FDA approved our Silver Spring facility for commercial manufacturing of treprostinil. In November 2009, we also received European regulatory approval to manufacture treprostinil in our Silver Spring facility. In addition, we are currently developing the capacity to manufacture Remodulin and Tyvaso at our Silver Spring facility. Baxter Healthcare Corporation (Baxter) manufactures Remodulin for us. In April 2009, we amended our agreement with Baxter to extend its term through 2013 In addition, we agreed that Remodulin will be manufactured using a different set of equipment and in larger quantities than the current manufacturing process. Since Baxter will make Remodulin on different equipment and in a larger production batch than the current process, we are required to have the new equipment and process approved by the FDA. We are currently conducting the validation testing for the new equipment and process. If the validation testing is successful, we anticipate filing for FDA approval of the new equipment and process during 2011 Baxter continues to manufacture Remodulin for us according to the process currently approved by the FDA. In January 2011, the FDA approved Hollister Stier Laboratories, LLC as our second Remodulin manufacturer, in the larger quantities described above. We are actively working towards obtaining approval to manufacture Remodulin and Tyvaso in our Silver Spring facility. Our goal is to become the primary manufacturer with contracted third party manufacturers supplementing our manufacturing capacity. Also, although we maintain a 3 year inventory of Remodulin and Tyvaso based on expected demand, we believe that having third parties approved to manufacture these products will mitigate some of our manufacturing risks, including the risk that we might not be able to produce sufficient quantities to meet patient demand. We rely on Catalent Pharma Solutions, Inc. (formerly Cardinal Health, Inc.) (Catalent) to do the following (1) conduct stability studies on Remodulin, (2) manufacture Tyvaso, (3) serve as a backup manufacturer for oral treprostinil, and (4) analyze other products we develop. We have begun manufacturing oral treprostinil tablets, which are being used in our clinical trials, in our manufacturing facility in Research Triangle Park, North Carolina. Under our manufacturing and supply agreement with Lilly, Lilly manufactures and distributes Adcirca through its wholesaler ne2rk in the same manner that it distributes its own pharmaceutical products. Under the terms of this agreement, we take title to Adcirca upon completion of its manufacture by Lilly. Adcirca is shipped to customers, generally pharmaceutical wholesalers, in accordance with purchase orders received by Lilly. Although Lilly provides these services on our behalf, we maintain the risk of loss as it pertains to inventory and non payment of invoices. 20 Table of Contents We manufacture the nebulizer used in our Tyvaso Inhalation System. While we purchase the comp1nts and manage the manufacturing process, NEBU TEC supplies all the labor to manufacture the nebulizers. In December 2010, Minnetronix, Inc. (Minnetronix) was approved by the FDA as a second manufacturer of the Tyvaso Inhalation System. Although we believe that other manufacturers and suppliers could provide similar products, services and materials, there are few companies that could replace these manufacturers and suppliers. A change in supplier or manufacturer could cause a delay in the manufacture, distribution and research efforts associated with our respective products or result in increased costs. See also Item 1A Risk Factors included in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. Competition Many drug companies engage in research and development to commercialize products to treat cardiovascular and infectious diseases and cancer. For the treatment of PAH, we compete with many approved products in the United States and the rest of the world, including the following Flolan. The first product approved by the FDA for treating PAH, Flolan, also known as epoprostenol, is a prostacyclin that is delivered by intravenous infusion. Glaxo began marketing Flolan in the United States in 1996. In 2006, Myogen, Inc. (Myogen) acquired the marketing rights from Glaxo for Flolan in the United States. In November 2006, Myogen was acquired by Gilead Sciences, Inc. (Gilead). In 2009, Gilead returned the rights to Flolan to Glaxo. The generic exclusivity period for Flolan expired in April 2007; Generic epoprostenol. In April 2008, Teva announced that the FDA approved its version of generic epoprostenol for the treatment of PAH. This is the first approved generic version of Flolan. In June 2008, GeneraMedix Inc. (GeneraMedix) received FDA approval for its version of epoprostenol, which is stable at room temperature. In February 2009, Actelion announced that it had entered into an agreement with GeneraMedix to acquire its epoprostenol product, marketed as Veletri, and began commercial sales in the second half of 2010; Ventavis. Approved in December 2004 in the United States and in September 2003 in Europe, Ventavis is an inhaled prostacyclin analogue. Ventavis was initially marketed by CoTherix, Inc. (CoTherix) in the United States and is marketed by Bayer Schering Pharma AG in Europe as Iloprost. In January 2007, CoTherix was acquired by Actelion, the manufacturer and distributor of Tracleer and distributor of Veletri; Tracleer. The first oral drug to be approved for PAH, Tracleer is also the first drug in its class, known as ETRAs. Tracleer was approved in December 2001 in the United States and in May 2002 in Europe. Tracleer is marketed worldwide by Actelion; Revatio. Approved in June 2005 in the United States, Revatio is also an oral therapy and is marketed by Pfizer. Revatio contains sildenafil, the same active ingredient as Viagra, and is the first PDE 5 inhibitor to be approved for PAH; Letairis . Approved in June 2007 in the United States, Letairis is an oral therapy marketed by Gilead for the treatment of PAH. Like Tracleer, Letairis is an ETRA. In April 2008, Glaxo received marketing authorization from the EMA for Letairis in Europe where it is known as Volibris ; and Thelin . Approved in August 2006 in the EU, Thelin is an oral therapy, which was developed and initially marketed in Europe by Encysive Pharmaceuticals Inc. (Encysive), for the treatment of PAH. Like Tracleer and Letairis, Thelin is an ETRA. In June 2008, Pfizer completed its acquisition of Encysive. During the fourth quarter of 2010, Pfizer discontinued selling Thelin due to safety concerns. 21 Table of Contents Due to their ease of use, oral therapies such as Adcirca, Revatio and Tracleer are generally considered first line therapies for newly diagnosed NYHA Class II PAH patients, although Remodulin is also approved for NYHA Class II PAH patients and patients may improve to NYHA Class II status while on Remodulin even if Remodulin is started by patients in a more serious stage of the disease. Inhaled therapies like Tyvaso and Ventavis are generally used in NYHA Class III patients during the middle stages of the PAH disease treatment cycle, although Remodulin is also approved for NYHA Class III patients and is frequently used within this group. More complex infusion therapies such as Remodulin and Flolan are often used as later stage therapies for NYHA Class IV patients, although many doctors start patients on these therapies prior to the advanced disease progression associated with NYHA Class IV. The use of the available oral therapies and Tyvaso, either al1 or in combination, could delay the need for infusion therapy for many patients. As a result, the success of other therapies in preventing disease progression affects our commercial products. Furthermore, the commercialization of generic forms of other approved PAH therapies may exert downward pressure on the pricing of our products. For further discussion on this risk, see Item 1A Risk Factors We may not compete successfully with established and newly developed drugs or products, or the companies that develop and market them. We compete with the developers, manufacturers and distributors all of these products for customers, funding, access to licenses, personnel, third party collaborators, product development and commercialization. Almost all of these companies have substantially greater financial, marketing, sales, distribution and technical resources, and more experience in research and development, product development and marketing, clinical trials and regulatory matters, than we have. Governmental Regulation Pharmaceutical Product Approval Process The research, development, testing, manufacture, promotion, marketing, distribution, sampling, storage, recordkeeping, post approval monitoring and reporting, and import and export of pharmaceutical products (drugs or biological products, hereinafter collectively drugs) are extensively regulated by governmental agencies in the United States and in other countries. Failure to comply with applicable U.S. requirements, pursuant to the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, the Public Health Service Act, and other federal statutes and regulations, may subject a company to a variety of administrative or judicial sanctions, such as FDA refusal to approve pending new drug applications (NDAs) or biologics license applications (BLAs), warning letters, product recalls, product seizures, total or partial suspension of production or distribution, injunctions, fines, civil penalties, and criminal prosecution. Satisfaction of FDA pre market approval requirements typically takes many years, and the actual time required may vary substantially based upon the type, complexity and novelty of the product or disease. Drugs are subject to rigorous regulation by the FDA in the United States, the EMA in the EU and similar regulatory authorities in other countries. The steps ordinarily required before a new drug may be marketed in the United States, which are similar to steps required in most other countries, include Preclinical laboratory tests, preclinical studies in animals, formulation studies and the submission to the FDA of an investigational new drug application (IND) for a new drug; Clinical studies in healthy volunteers; Clinical studies in patients to explore safety, efficacy and dose response characteristics; Adequate and well controlled clinical trials to establish the safety and efficacy of the drug for each indication; 22 Table of Contents The submission of an NDA or BLA to the FDA; and FDA review and approval of the NDA or BLA prior to any commercial sale or shipment of the drug. Preclinical tests include laboratory evaluation of product chemistry and formulation, as well as animal studies to explore toxicity and for proof of concept. The conduct of the preclinical tests must comply with federal regulations and requirements including good laboratory practices. In the United States, the results of preclinical testing are submitted to the FDA as part of an IND, along with other information including information about product chemistry, manufacturing and controls and a proposed clinical trial protocol. A 30 day review period after the filing of each IND is generally required prior to the commencement of clinical testing in humans. If the FDA has not commented on or questi1d the IND within this 30 day period, the clinical trial proposed in the IND may begin. At any time during this 30 day period or at any time thereafter, the FDA may halt proposed or ongoing clinical trials until it authorizes trials under specified terms. The IND process may be extremely costly and may substantially delay development of our products. Moreover, positive results of preclinical tests will not necessarily indicate positive results in clinical trials. Clinical trials involve the administration of the investigational new drug or biologic to healthy volunteers or patients under the supervision of a qualified investigator. Clinical trials must be conducted in compliance with federal regulations, good clinical practices (GCP) and protocols detailing the objectives of the trial, the parameters to be used in monitoring safety and the effectiveness criteria to be evaluated. Each protocol involving testing on U.S. patients and subsequent protocol amendments must be submitted to the FDA as part of the IND. The FDA may order the temporary or permanent discontinuation of a clinical trial at any time or impose other sanctions if it believes that the clinical trial is not being conducted in accordance with FDA requirements or presents an unacceptable risk to the clinical trial patients. The study protocol and informed consent information for patients in clinical trials must also be submitted to an institutional review board (IRB) for approval. An IRB may also require the clinical trial at a site to be halted temporarily or permanently for failure to comply with the IRB's requirements, or may impose other conditions. Clinical trials in support of an NDA or a BLA are typically conducted in 3 sequential phases, but the phases may overlap. During Phase I, the initial introduction of the drug into healthy human subjects or patients, the drug is tested to assess its effects on bodily functions and safety, including side effects associated with increasing doses. Phase II usually involves studies in a limited patient population to assess the efficacy of the drug in specific, targeted indications; assess tolerance and optimal dosage; and identify possible adverse effects and safety risks. If a compound is found to be potentially effective and to have an acceptable safety profile in Phase II evaluations, then Phase III trials, also called pivotal studies, major studies or advanced clinical trials, are undertaken to further demonstrate clinical efficacy and to further test for safety within an expanded patient population at geographically diverse clinical study sites. After successful completion of the required clinical testing, an NDA or a BLA is typically submitted to the FDA in the United States, and an MAA is typically submitted to the EMA in the EU. FDA approval of the NDA or BLA is required before marketing of the product may begin in the U.S. The NDA or BLA must include the results of all preclinical, clinical and other testing and a compilation of data relating to the product's pharmacology, chemistry, manufacture, and controls. The cost of preparing and submitting an NDA or BLA is substantial. Under federal law, the submission of most NDAs and BLAs is additionally subject to a substantial application fee, currently exceeding $15 million, and the manufacturer and or sponsor of an approved new drug application are also subject to annual product and establishment (manufacturing site) fees, currently exceeding $86,000 per product 23 Table of Contents and $497,000 per establishment. These fees are typically increased annually. However, the application, product, and establishment fees may be waived for orphan drugs if certain requirements are met. The FDA has 60 days from its receipt of an NDA or a BLA to determine whether the application will be accepted for filing based on the agency's threshold determination that it is sufficiently complete to permit substantive review. Once the submission is accepted for filing, the FDA begins an in depth review. The FDA has agreed to certain performance goals in the review of new drug applications. Most such applications for non priority drug products are reviewed within ten months while most applications for priority review drugs, that is, drugs that the FDA determines represent a significant improvement over existing therapy, are reviewed in six months. The review process may be extended by the FDA for 3 additional months to consider certain information or clarification regarding information already provided in the submission. The FDA may also refer applications for novel pharmaceutical products or pharmaceutical products which present difficult questions of safety or efficacy to an advisory committee, typically a panel that includes clinicians and other experts, for review, evaluation and a recommendation as to whether the application should be approved. The FDA is not bound by the recommendation of an advisory committee, but it generally follows such recommendations. Before approving an NDA or a BLA, the FDA will typically inspect 1 or more clinical sites to assure compliance with GCP. Additionally, the FDA will inspect the facility or the facilities at which the drug is manufactured. The FDA will not approve the product unless compliance with current good manufacturing practices is satisfactory and the NDA or BLA contains data that provide substantial evidence that the pharmaceutical product is safe and effective for the indication studied. In the United States, if FDA evaluations of the application and the manufacturing facilities are favorable, the FDA may issue either an approval letter or a complete response letter. A complete response letter will usually contain a number of conditions that must be met in order to secure final approval of the application and authorization of commercial marketing of the drug for certain indications. If and when those deficiencies have been addressed to the FDA's satisfaction in a resubmission of the NDA or BLA, the FDA will issue an approval letter. The FDA has committed to reviewing such resubmissions in 2 or six months depending on the type of information included. An approval letter authorizes commercial marketing of the drug with specific prescribing information for specific indications. To continue marketing our products after approval, applicable regulations require us to maintain a positive risk benefit profile, maintain regulatory applications through periodic reports to regulatory authorities, fulfill pharmacovigilance requirements, maintain manufacturing facilities according to the FDA's current Good Manufacturing Practices requirements, and successfully complete regulatory agency inspections, among other requirements. Our manufacturing facilities are subject to continual review and periodic inspections. As a condition of NDA or BLA approval, the FDA may require substantial post approval testing and surveillance to monitor the product's safety or efficacy and may impose other conditions, including labeling restrictions which can materially affect the potential market and profitability of the pharmaceutical product. Once granted, product approvals may be withdrawn if compliance with regulatory standards is not maintained or problems are identified following initial marketing. Orphan Drugs Under the Orphan Drug Act, an applicant can request the FDA to designate a product as an "orphan drug" in the United States if the drug is intended to treat an orphan, or rare, disease or condition. A disease or condition is considered orphan if it affects fewer than 200,000 people in the United States. After the FDA grants orphan drug designation, the generic identity of the drug and its potential orphan use are disclosed publicly by the FDA. Orphan drug designation does not shorten the duration of the regulatory review and approval process. The first NDA applicant to receive orphan drug designation and FDA approval of the drug for the designated disease is entitled to a seven year exclusive marketing period in the U.S. for that product for that indication. During the seven year 24 Table of Contents period, the FDA may not approve any other applications to market the same drug for the same disease, except in limited circumstances, such as a showing of clinical superiority to the product with orphan drug exclusivity. Orphan drug exclusivity does not prevent the FDA from approving a different drug for the same disease or condition, or the same drug for a different disease or condition. Among the other benefits of orphan drug designation are tax credits for certain research and a waiver of the NDA application user fee and product and establishment user fees. The FDA granted orphan designation for the active ingredient treprostinil for the treatment of PAH as a continuous infusion. However, this designation does not preclude us from seeking orphan drug designation for other formulations or routes of administration, such as oral or inhaled, of treprostinil to treat PAH, or for treprostinil used to treat other orphan diseases. In order for the FDA to grant orphan drug designation for other formulations or routes of administration of treprostinil to treat PAH, we must demonstrate that such new formulation or route of administration is clinically superior to the formulation or route of administration previously granted orphan designation. Pediatric Information Under the Pediatric Research Equity Act of 2007 (PREA), NDAs, or BLAs and supplements to NDAs or BLAs must contain data to assess the safety and effectiveness of the drug for the claimed indication(s) in all relevant pediatric subpopulations and to support dosing and administration for each such pediatric subpopulation. The FDA may grant deferrals for submission of data or full or partial waivers. Unless otherwise required by regulation, PREA does not apply to any drug for an indication for which orphan drug designation has been granted. The Best Pharmaceuticals For Children Act, or BPCA, provides sponsors with an additional six month period of market exclusivity on all forms of the drug containing the active moiety, if the sponsor submits results of pediatric studies specifically requested by the FDA under BPCA. In order to receive the BPCA exclusivity, the drug must have other existing patent or exclusivity protection in effect. Hatch Waxman Act The Hatch Waxman Act was enacted to encourage competition between brand and generic pharmaceutical companies. It created a faster approval process for generic drugs, called the Abbreviated New Drug Application (ANDA), while it provided protection to brand pharmaceuticals by extending their patent protection. Upon approval of a drug through an NDA, applicants are required to submit to the FDA each patent that covers the applicant's product or FDA approved method of using this product. Those patents are then published in the FDA's Approved Drug Products with Therapeutic Equivalence Evaluations, commonly known as the Orange Book. Drugs listed in the Orange Book can, in turn, be cited by potential competitors in support of approval of an ANDA. Generally, an ANDA provides for marketing of a drug product that has the same active ingredients in the same strength(s), route of administration, and dosage form as the listed drug and has been shown through bioequivalence testing to be therapeutically equivalent to the listed drug. ANDA applicants are not required to conduct or submit results of pre clinical or clinical tests to prove the safety or effectiveness of their drug product, other than the requirement for bioequivalence testing. Drugs approved in this way are commonly referred to as "generic equivalents" to the listed drug, and can often be substituted by pharmacists under prescriptions written for the original listed drug. The ANDA applicant is required to certify to the FDA concerning any patents listed for the approved product in the FDA's Orange Book. Specifically, the applicant must certify that (i) the required patent information has not been filed; (ii) the listed patent has expired; (iii) the listed patent has not expired, but will expire on a particular date and approval is sought after patent expiration; or (iv) the listed patent is invalid or will not be infringed by the new product. A certification that the new product will not infringe the already approved product's listed patents or that such patents are invalid is called a Paragraph IV certification. If the applicant does not challenge the listed patents, the ANDA 25 Table of Contents application will not be approved until all the listed patents claiming the referenced product have expired. Alternatively, for a patent covering an approved method of use, an ANDA applicant may submit a statement to the FDA that the company is not seeking approval for the covered use. If the ANDA applicant has submitted a Paragraph IV certification to the FDA, the applicant must also send notice of the Paragraph IV certification to the NDA and patent holders once the ANDA has been accepted for filing by the FDA. The NDA and patent holders may then initiate a patent infringement lawsuit in response to the notice of the Paragraph IV certification. The filing of a patent infringement lawsuit within 45 days of the receipt of a Paragraph IV certification automatically prevents the FDA from approving the ANDA until the earlier of 30 months, expiration of the patent, settlement of the lawsuit or a decision in the infringement case that is favorable to the ANDA applicant. The ANDA application also will not be approved until any non patent exclusivity, such as exclusivity for obtaining approval of a new chemical entity, listed in the Orange Book for the referenced product has expired. Federal law provides a period of five years following approval of a drug containing no previously approved active moiety, during which ANDAs for generic versions of those drugs cannot be submitted unless the submission contains a Paragraph IV challenge to a listed patent, in which case the submission may be made four years following the original product approval. Federal law provides for an exclusivity period of 3 years, during which the FDA cannot grant effective approval of an ANDA, following approval of a listed drug that contains previously approved active ingredients but is approved in a new dosage form, route of administration or combination, or for a new condition of use that was required to be supported by new clinical trials conducted by or for the sponsor. Both of the five year and 3 year exclusivity periods, as well as any unexpired patents listed in the Orange Book for the listed drug, can be extended by six months if the FDA grants the NDA sponsor a period of pediatric exclusivity based on studies submitted by the sponsor in response to a written request. The Hatch Waxman Act provides that patent terms may be extended to compensate for some of the patent life that is lost during the FDA regulatory review period for a product. This extension period would generally be 1 half the time between the effective date of an IND and the submission date of an NDA, plus all of the time between the submission date of an NDA and its approval, subject to a maximum extension of five years. Similar patent term extensions are available under European laws. Following FDA approval, we filed a patent term extension application with the United States Patent and Trademark Office for our patent covering the method of treating PAH using Remodulin. The application was approved in February 2005 with the maximum patent term extension of five years, and the patent will expire on October 6, 2014. Section 505(b)(2) New Drug Applications Most drug products (other than biological products) obtain FDA marketing approval pursuant to an NDA or an ANDA. A third alternative is a special type of NDA, commonly referred to as a Section 505(b)(2) NDA, which enables the applicant to rely, in part, on the FDA's finding of safety and efficacy data for an existing product, or published literature, in support of its application. Section 505(b)(2) NDAs often provide an alternate path to FDA approval for new or improved formulations or new uses of previously approved products. Section 505(b)(2) permits the filing of an NDA where at least some of the information required for approval comes from studies not conducted by or for the applicant and for which the applicant has not obtained a right of reference. The applicant may rely upon certain preclinical or clinical studies conducted for an approved product. The FDA may also require companies to perform additional studies or measurements to support the change from the approved product. The FDA may then approve the new product candidate for all or some of the labeled indications for which the referenced product has been approved, as well as for any new indication for which the Section 505(b)(2) NDA applicant has submitted data. 26 Table of Contents To the extent that the Section 505(b)(2) applicant is relying on prior FDA findings of safety and efficacy, the applicant is required to certify to the FDA concerning any patents listed for the approved product in the Orange Book to the same extent that an ANDA applicant would. Thus, approval of a Section 505(b)(2) NDA can be delayed until all the listed patents claiming the referenced product have expired, until any non patent exclusivity, such as exclusivity for obtaining approval of a new chemical entity, listed in the Orange Book for the referenced product has expired, and, in the case of a Paragraph IV certification and subsequent patent infringement suit, until the earlier of 30 months, settlement of the lawsuit or a decision in the infringement case that is favorable to the Section 505(b)(2) NDA applicant. Other Regulatory Requirements Once an NDA or a BLA is approved, a product will be subject to certain post approval requirements. For instance, the FDA closely regulates the post approval marketing and promotion of drugs, including standards and regulations for direct to consumer advertising, off label promotion, industry sponsored scientific and educational activities and promotional activities involving the internet. Pharmaceutical products may be marketed only for the approved indications and in accordance with the provisions of the approved labeling. Changes to some of the conditions established in an approved application, including changes in indications, labeling, or manufacturing processes or facilities, require submission and FDA approval of a new or supplemental NDA BLA before the change can be implemented. An NDA BLA supplement for a new indication typically requires clinical data similar to that in the original application, and the FDA uses the same procedures and actions in reviewing supplements as it does in reviewing NDAs or BLAs. Adverse event reporting and submission of periodic reports are required following FDA approval of an NDA or a BLA. The FDA also may require post marketing testing, known as Phase 4 testing, risk minimization action plans, and surveillance to monitor the effects of an approved product or place conditions on an approval that could restrict the distribution or use of the product. In addition, quality control as well as drug manufacture, packaging, and labeling procedures must continue to conform to current good manufacturing practices (cGMPs) after approval. Manufacturers and certain of their subcontractors are required to register their establishments with the FDA and certain state agencies, and are subject to periodic unannounced inspections by the FDA during which the agency inspects manufacturing facilities to assess compliance with cGMPs. Accordingly, manufacturers must continue to expend time, m1y and effort in the areas of production and quality control to maintain compliance with cGMPs. Regulatory authorities may withdraw product approvals or request product recalls if a company fails to comply with regulatory standards or if previously unrecognized problems are subsequently discovered. Marketing Pharmaceutical Products Outside the United States Outside of the United States, our ability to market our products is also contingent upon receiving marketing authorizations from regulatory authorities. The foreign regulatory approval process may include some or all of the risks associated with FDA approval set forth above. The requirements governing the conduct of clinical trials and marketing authorization vary widely from country to country. At present, foreign marketing authorizations are applied for at a national level, although, within Europe, procedures are available to companies wishing to market a product in more than 1 EU member state. In the EU, marketing authorizations may be submitted through a centralized body or through a decentralized mutual recognition or a national level process. The centralized procedure is mandatory for the approval of biotechnology products, high technology products and orphan products and is available at the applicant's option for other products. The centralized procedure provides for the grant 27 Table of Contents of a single marketing authorization that is valid in all EU member countries. The decentralized mutual recognition procedure is available for all medicinal products that are not subject to the centralized procedure. The decentralized mutual recognition procedure provides for mutual recognition of national approval decisions, changes existing procedures for national approvals and establishes procedures for coordinated EU actions on products, suspensions and withdrawals. Under this procedure, the holder of a national marketing authorization for which mutual recognition is sought may submit an application to 1 or more EU member countries, certify that the dossier is identical to that on which the first approval was based, or explain any differences and certify that identical dossiers are being submitted to all EU member countries for which recognition is sought. Within 90 days of receiving the application and assessment report, each EU member country must decide whether to recognize approval. The procedure encourages member states to work with applicants and other regulatory authorities to resolve disputes concerning mutual recognition. Lack of objection of a given country within 90 days automatically results in approval in that country. Following receipt of marketing authorization in an EU member country, the applicant is then usually (depending on the country) required to engage in pricing discussions and negotiations with a separate prescription pricing authority in that country. Commercial sales are only able to commence in a country once pricing approval has been received. To secure European regulatory approvals for subcutaneous Remodulin for PAH, we used the mutual recognition process. Under the rules then applicable, centralized filing was not required and we perceived the decentralized mutual recognition procedure to be the most effective means for approval. We filed our first MAA in France in February 2001 Review of our application was completed in 2005. As a result, Remodulin was approved in 23 member countries of the EU under the mutual recognition process described above. We withdrew applications in Spain, the United Kingdom and Ireland with the intent of resubmitting some or all of the applications when we achieve approval for intravenous Remodulin since these countries required additional information not required by the other European countries. To secure European regulatory approval for Tyvaso, we submitted an MAA to the EMA via the centralized process in December 2008. Regulations in Europe have changed since we made our initial filing for Remodulin and all therapies for orphan diseases must now use the centralized process. In February 2010, we withdrew our MAA from consideration by the EMA due to the EMA's major objection related to findings of non compliance with good clinical practice at 2 clinical sites. The EMA stated that these findings would preclude a recommendation for approval of Tyvaso in the EU. The EMA had no major objections at the time of withdrawal related to the safety or efficacy of Tyvaso. U.S. Regulation of Medical Devices Our medical devices are subject to regulation by government agencies, including the FDA. To varying degrees, each government agency requires us to comply with laws and regulations governing the developing, testing, manufacturing, labeling, marketing and distribution of our medical devices. Medical devices, unless expressly exempt by regulation, are required to be manufactured in conformance with the FDA's Quality System Regulations (QSRs). The QSRs are complex regulations that impose methods, procedures, and documentation requirements regarding the manufacturing and quality assurance activities of medical devices, including the design, testing, control, manufacturing, labeling, packaging, storage, and shipping of medical devices. We are also subject to periodic inspections by regulatory agencies to ensure that we meet all regulatory requirements. Upon an inspection, if the FDA were to conclude that we are not in compliance with applicable laws or regulations, or that any of our medical devices may pose unreasonable health risks, the FDA could require us to notify health professionals or others of these risks, order a recall, repair, replacement or refund of such device, or detain or seize adulterated or misbranded medical devices. The FDA may also impose operating restrictions, enjoin or restrain certain conduct resulting in violations of applicable law pertaining to medical devices and assess civil or criminal penalties. 28 Table of Contents To maintain approval of the Tyvaso Inhalation System in the United States, we must comply with the QSRs, and the FDA may also require additional patient data to support approval for this device. Our telemedicine products are manufactured at contract facilities that must comply with the QSRs. These devices are designed and sold by Medicomp and have received marketing clearance from the FDA under Section 510(k) of the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act. Government Reimbursement of Pharmaceutical Products In the United States, many independent third party payers, as well as the Medicare and State Medicaid programs, reimburse buyers of our commercial products. Medicare is the federal program that provides health care benefits to senior citizens and certain disabled and chronically ill persons. Medicaid is the federal program administered by the states to provide health care benefits to certain indigent persons. The Medicare contractors who administer the program provide reimbursement for our pharmaceutical commercial products at a rate generally equal to 95% of the published average wholesale price as of October 1, 2003 (the Medicare Part B payment formula for drugs infused through durable medical equipment) or 106% of Average Sales Price (the Medicare Part B payment formula for drugs inhaled through durable medical equipment). The State Medicaid programs also generally provide reimbursement for our commercial products, at reimbursement rates that are below the published average wholesale price and that vary from state to state. In return for including our pharmaceutical commercial products in the Medicare and Medicaid programs, we have agreed to pay a rebate to State Medicaid agencies that provide reimbursement for those products. We have also agreed to sell our commercial products under contracts with the Department of Veterans Affairs, Department of Defense, Public Health Service and numerous other federal agencies as well as certain hospitals that are designated as 340B covered entities (entities designated by federal programs to receive drugs at discounted prices) at prices that are significantly below the price we charge to our specialty pharmaceutical distributors. These programs and contracts are highly regulated and impose restrictions on our business. Failure to comply with these regulations and restrictions could result in a loss of our ability to continue receiving reimbursement for our drugs. We estimate that between 35 50% of Remodulin, Tyvaso and Adcirca sales in the United States are reimbursed under the Medicare and Medicaid programs. Anti Kickback, False Claims Laws and The Prescription Drug Marketing Act In addition to FDA restrictions on marketing pharmaceutical products, several other types of state and federal laws have been applied to restrict certain marketing practices in the pharmaceutical industry in recent years. These laws include anti kickback statutes and false claims statutes. The federal healthcare program anti kickback statute prohibits, among other things, knowingly and willfully offering, paying, soliciting or receiving remuneration to induce or in return for purchasing, leasing, ordering or arranging for the purchase, lease or order of any healthcare item or service reimbursable under Medicare, Medicaid or other federally financed healthcare programs. This statute has been interpreted to apply to arrangements between pharmaceutical manufacturers on the 1 hand and prescribers, purchasers and formulary managers on the other. Violations of the anti kickback statute are punishable by imprisonment, criminal fines, civil m1tary penalties and exclusion from participation in federal healthcare programs. Although there are a number of statutory exemptions and regulatory safe harbors protecting certain common activities from prosecution or other regulatory sanctions, the exemptions and safe harbors are drawn narrowly, and practices that involve remuneration intended to induce prescribing, purchases or recommendations may be subject to scrutiny if they do not qualify for an exemption or safe harbor. Federal false claims laws prohibit any person from knowingly presenting, or causing to be presented, a false claim for payment to the federal government, or knowingly making, or causing to be made, a false statement to have a false claim paid. Recently, several pharmaceutical and other 29 Table of Contents healthcare companies have been prosecuted under these laws for allegedly inflating drug prices they report to pricing services, which in turn were used by the government to set Medicare and Medicaid reimbursement rates, and for allegedly providing free product to customers with the expectation that the customers would bill federal programs for the product. In addition, certain marketing practices, including off label promotion, may also violate false claims laws. The majority of states also have statutes or regulations similar to the federal anti kickback law and false claims laws, which apply to Item and services reimbursed under Medicaid and other state programs, or, in several states, apply regardless of the payor. Sanctions under these federal and state laws may include civil m1tary penalties, exclusion of a manufacturer's products from reimbursement under government programs, criminal fines, and imprisonment. As part of the sales and marketing process, pharmaceutical companies frequently provide samples of approved drugs to physicians. The Prescription Drug Marketing Act (PDMA), imposes requirements and limitations upon the provision of drug samples to physicians, and prohibits states from licensing distributors of prescription drugs unless the state licensing program meets certain federal guidelines that include minimum standards for storage, handling and record keeping. In addition, the PDMA sets forth civil and criminal penalties for violations. Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010 The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act of 2010, as amended by the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (PPACA) is intended to expand healthcare coverage within the U.S. Several provisions of the new law, which have varying effective dates, may affect us and will likely increase certain of our costs. For example, an increase in the Medicaid rebate rate from 15.1 percent to 231 percent is effective as of January 1, 2010, and the volume of rebated drugs has been expanded to include beneficiaries in Medicaid managed care organizations, effective as of March 23, 2010. The PPACA also imposes an annual fee on pharmaceutical manufacturers beginning in 2011, based on the manufacturer's sale of branded pharmaceuticals and biologics (excluding orphan drugs) to certain U.S. government programs during the preceding year; expands the 340B drug discount program (excluding orphan drugs) including the creation of new penalties for non compliance; and includes a 50% discount on brand name drugs for Medicare Part D participants in the coverage gap, or "donut hole". The law also revised the definition of "average manufacturer price" for reporting purposes effective October 1, 2010, which could increase the amount of the Medicaid drug rebates paid to states. The PPACA also created a regulatory pathway for the abbreviated approval of biological products that are demonstrated to be "biosimilar" or "interchangeable" with an FDA approved biological product. In order to meet the standard of interchangeability, a sponsor must demonstrate that the biosimilar product can be expected to produce the same clinical result as the reference product, and for a product that is administered more than once, that the risk of switching between the reference product and biosimilar product is not greater than the risk of maintaining the patient on the reference product. Such biosimilars would reference biological products approved in the U.S. The law establishes a period of 12 years of data exclusivity for reference products, which protects the data in the original BLA by prohibiting sponsors of biosimilars from gaining FDA approval based in part on reference to data in the original BLA. In addition, the PPACA imposes new reporting requirements for pharmaceutical and device manufacturers with regard to payments or other transfers of value made to physicians and teaching hospitals, effective March 30, 2013 In addition, pharmaceutical and device manufacturers will be required to report investment interests held by physicians and their immediate family members during the preceding calendar year. Such information is to be made publicly available by the Secretary of Health and Human Services in a searchable format beginning September 30, 2013 Failure to submit 30 Table of Contents required information may result in civil m1tary penalties of up to $150,000 per year (and up to $1 million per year for "knowing failures") for all payments, transfers of value or ownership or investment interests not reported in an annual submission. Further, the PPACA amends the intent requirement of the federal anti kickback and criminal health care fraud statutes. A person or entity no longer needs to have actual knowledge of this statute or specific intent to violate it. In addition, the government may assert that a claim including Item or services resulting from a violation of the federal anti kickback statute constitutes a false or fraudulent claim for purposes of the false claims laws. State Pharmaceutical and Medical Device Marketing Laws If not preempted by the PPACA, several states, such as Maine, Massachusetts, and Vermont, require pharmaceutical companies to report expenses relating to the marketing and promotion of pharmaceutical products and to report gifts and payments to individual physicians in those states. Other states prohibit various other marketing related activities. Still other states require the posting of information relating to clinical studies and their outcomes. In addition, certain states, such as California, Nevada, and Massachusetts, require pharmaceutical companies to implement compliance programs or marketing codes and several other states are considering similar proposals. Compliance with these laws is difficult and time consuming, and companies that do not comply with these state laws face civil penalties. Employees We had 520 employees as of February 5, 2011 We also maintain active independent contractor relationships with various individuals, most of whom have month to month or annual consulting agreements. We believe our employee relations are excellent. Industry Segments and Geographic Areas We operate 2 business segments pharmaceuticals and telemedicine. We sell our products in the United States and throughout the rest of the world. The information required by Item 101(b) and 101(d) of Regulation S K relating to financial information about industry segments and geographical areas, respectively, is contained in Note 19 Segment Information to our consolidated financial statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. Corporate Website Our Internet website address is http www.unither.com . Our filings on Form 10 K, Form 10 Q, Form 3, Form 4, Form 5, Form 8 K and any and all amendments thereto are available free of charge through this internet website as soon as reasonably practicable after they are filed or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). They are also available through the SEC at http www.sec.gov edgar searchedgar companysearch.html . 31 Table of Contents EXECUTIVE OFFICERS OF THE REGISTRANT The following is a list, as of February 1, 2011, setting forth certain information regarding our executive officers. Each executive officer holds office until the first meeting of the Board of Directors after the annual meeting of shareholders, and until his or her successor is elected and qualified or until his or her earlier resignation or removal. Each executive officer's employment will end pursuant to the terms of his or her employment contract. Each of the employment contracts generally provides for an initial term of service of five years, which five year term may be renewed after each year for additional 1 year periods. Name Age Position Martine A. Rothblatt, Ph.D., J.D., M.B.A. 56 Chairman, Chief Executive Officer and Director Roger Jeffs, Ph.D. 49 President, Chief Operating Officer and Director John M. Ferrari 56 Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer Paul A. Mahon, J.D. 47 Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary Martine A. Rothblatt, Ph.D., J.D., M.B.A ., started United Therapeutics in 1996 and has served as Chairman and Chief Executive Officer since its inception. Prior to United Therapeutics, she founded and served as Chairman and CEO of Sirius Satellite Radio. She also led the International Bar Association's efforts to present the United Nations with a draft Human Genome Treaty. Her book, Y OUR L IFE OR M INE H OW G EOETHICS C AN R ESOLVE THE C ONFLICT B ETWEEN P UBLIC AND P RIVATE I NTERESTS I N X ENOTRANSPLANTATION , was published by Ashgate in 2004. She is a co inventor on 3 of our patents pertaining to treprostinil. Roger Jeffs, Ph.D., joined United Therapeutics in September 1998 as Director of Research, Development and Medical. Dr. Jeffs was promoted to Vice President of Research, Development and Medical in July 2000 and to President and Chief Operating Officer in January 2001 Prior to 1998, Dr. Jeffs worked at Amgen, Inc. as Manager of Clinical Affairs and Associate Director of Clinical Research from 1995 to 1998, where he served as the worldwide clinical leader of the Infectious Disease Program. John M. Ferrari joined United Therapeutics in May 2001 as Controller. Mr. Ferrari was promoted to Vice President of Finance in December 2003 and to Vice President of Finance and Treasurer in June 2004. In August 2006, Mr. Ferrari was promoted to Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer. Prior to joining United Therapeutics, Mr. Ferrari served as Controller for Blackboard, Inc., from 1998 to 2001 Prior to his employment with Blackboard, Inc., Mr. Ferrari served in various senior financial management positions since beginning his accounting career in 1984. Paul A. Mahon, J.D., has served as General Counsel and Corporate Secretary of United Therapeutics since its inception in 1996. In June 2001, Mr. Mahon joined United Therapeutics full time as Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary. In November 2003, Mr. Mahon was promoted to Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary. Prior to June 2001, he served United Therapeutics, beginning with its formation in 1996, in his capacity as principal and managing partner of a law firm specializing in technology and media law. 32 Table of Contents ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS Forward Looking Statements This Annual Report on Form 10 K contains forward looking statements made pursuant to the safe harbor provisions of Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (the Exchange Act) and the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 which are based on our beliefs and expectations as to future outcomes. These statements include, among others, statements relating to the following Expectations of revenues, profitability, and cash flows; The sufficiency of current and future working capital for planned and unplanned needs including paying the holders of our Senior Convertible Notes the principal due when the Notes mature in October 2011; The ability to obtain financing or raise capital in the future; The value of our common stock; The maintenance of domestic and international regulatory approvals; The timing and outcome of clinical studies and regulatory filings, including in particular our FREEDOM C 2 and FREEDOM M trials and anticipated filing of an NDA for oral treprostinil; The expected likelihood and timing of regulatory approvals for drug candidates under development and the timing of related sales; The outcome of potential future regulatory actions, including audits and inspections, from the FDA and international regulatory agencies; The expected volume and timing of sales of Remodulin (treprostinil) Injection (Remodulin), Adcirca (tadalafil) tablets (Adcirca) and Tyvaso (treprostinil) Inhalation Solution (Tyvaso) (collectively, referred to as our commercial products); The impact of competing therapies, including generic products, on sales of our commercial products; The expectation that we will be able to manufacture sufficient quantities and maintain adequate inventories of our commercial products; The adequacy of our intellectual property protections and expiration dates on our patents and licensed patents and products; The potential impact, if any, of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 on our business; The outcome of any litigation or arbitration proceedings in which we are or may become involved; Any statements preceded by, followed by or that include any form of the words "believe," "seek," "expect," "anticipate," "forecast," "project," "intend," "estimate," "should," "could," "may," "will," "plan," or similar expressions; and Other statements contained or incorporated by reference in this Annual Report on Form 10 K that are not historical facts. The statements identified as forward looking statements may exist in Item 7 Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations or elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. These statements are subject to risks and uncertainties and our actual results may differ materially from anticipated results. Factors that may cause such differences include, but are 33 Table of Contents not limited to, those discussed below. We undertake no obligation to publicly update forward looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise. Risks Related to Our Business We have a history of losses and may not maintain profitability. We have experienced financial reporting periods in which we incurred net losses. While we believe we develop our annual cash based operating budgets using reasonable assumptions and targets, unanticipated factors, including factors outside of our control, could affect our profitability and cause uneven quarterly and or annual operating results. We rely heavily on sales of Remodulin and Tyvaso to produce revenues. During the twelve months ended December 31, 2010, net Remodulin and Tyvaso sales accounted for 67 percent and 25 percent of our total revenues, respectively. A wide variety of events, many of which are described in other risk factors below, could cause sales of Remodulin and or Tyvaso to decline. For instance, if regulatory approvals for either of these products were withdrawn, we would be unable to sell the product and our business could be jeopardized. Any substantial change in the prescribing practices or dosing patterns of patients using Remodulin or Tyvaso due to combination therapy, side effects, adverse events, death or any other reasons, could decrease related revenues. In addition, we rely on third parties to produce, market, distribute and sell Remodulin and Tyvaso. The inability of any 1 of these third parties to perform these functions, or the failure of these parties to perform successfully, could negatively affect our revenues. We are also increasingly internalizing elements of the manufacturing process, and any failure to manage our internal manufacturing processes could result in a decrease in production and an inability to meet demand. Because we are highly dependent on sales of Remodulin and Tyvaso, any reduction in sales of either or both of these products would have a negative and possibly material adverse impact on our operations. If our products fail in clinical trials, we will be unable to obtain or maintain FDA and international regulatory approvals and will be unable to sell those products. To obtain regulatory approvals from the FDA and international regulatory agencies such as the EMA, we must conduct clinical trials demonstrating that our products are safe and effective. In the past, several of our product candidates failed or were discontinued at various stages in the development process. In addition, we may need to amend ongoing trials or the FDA and or international regulatory agencies may require us to perform additional trials beyond those we planned. Such occurrences could result in significant delays and additional costs, and related clinical trials may be unsuccessful. In November 2008, we reported that our FREEDOM C Phase III clinical trial of oral treprostinil did not achieve statistical significance for its primary endpoint. Because we have decided to amend the protocol for our current FREEDOM M Phase III clinical trial and conduct a new Phase III clinical trial, FREEDOM C 2 , we have experienced delays in completing our clinical trials for oral treprostinil and do not anticipate filing an NDA prior to 2012 As with all clinical trials, there is a risk that FREEDOM M and FREEDOM C 2 may not be successful. Upon filing an NDA, we could be subject to additional delays, if the FDA determines that it cannot approve the NDA as submitted. In such case, the FDA would issue a complete response letter, which would outline the deficiencies in the submission and may require substantial additional testing or information in order for the FDA to reconsider the application. If and when those deficiencies have been addressed to the FDA's satisfaction in a resubmission of the NDA, the FDA would then issue an approval letter. We may fail to address any such deficiencies adequately, in which case we would be unable to obtain FDA approval to market a given product candidate. 34 Table of Contents The length of time that it takes for us to complete clinical trials and obtain regulatory approval for marketing varies by product, product use and country. Furthermore, we cannot predict with certainty the length of time it will take to complete necessary clinical trials or obtain regulatory approval of our future products. Our clinical trials may be discontinued, delayed or disqualified for various reasons. These reasons include The drug is ineffective, or physicians believe that the drug is ineffective; Patients do not enroll in our studies at the rate we expect; Ongoing or new clinical trials conducted by drug companies in addition to our own clinical trials reduce the number of patients available for our trials; Patients experience severe side effects during treatment; Other investigational or approved therapies are viewed as more effective or convenient by physicians or patients; Our clinical trial sites or our contracted clinical trial administrators may not adhere to trial protocols and required quality controls, particularly as clinical trials expand into new territories; Our trials do not comply with applicable regulations or guidelines; We do not pass inspections by regulatory agencies; Patients die during our trials because of an adverse event related to the trial drug, their disease is too advanced, or they experience medical problems unrelated to the drug being studied; Drug supplies are unavailable or unsuitable for use in our studies; and The results of preclinical testing cause delays in our trials. In addition, the FDA and its international equivalents have substantial discretion over the approval process for pharmaceutical products. As such, these regulatory agencies may not agree that we have demonstrated the requisite level of product safety and efficacy to grant approval. We may not compete successfully with established and newly developed drugs or products, or the companies that develop and market them. We compete with well established drug companies for, among other things, funding, licenses, expertise, personnel, clinical trial patients and investigators, consultants and third party collaborators. We also compete with these companies for market share. Most of these competitors have substantially greater financial, marketing, manufacturing, sales, distribution and technical resources than we do. These competitors also have more experience in areas such as research and development, clinical trials, sales and marketing and regulatory matters than we do. There are several treatments that compete with our commercial therapies. For the treatment of PAH, we compete with a number of approved products in the United States and worldwide, including the following Flolan , Ventavis , Tracleer , Revatio , Letairis , Veletri and a generic intravenously administered product containing epoprostenol, the active ingredient in Flolan. Patients and doctors may perceive these competing products as safer, more effective, more convenient and or less expensive than our therapies. Alternatively, doctors may reduce the prescribed doses of our products if they prescribe them as combination therapy with our competitors' products. In addition, certain competing products are less invasive than Remodulin and the use of these products may delay or prevent initiation of Remodulin therapy. Any of these circumstances may suppress our sales growth, or cause our revenues to decline. 35 Table of Contents Actelion, Gilead and Pfizer presently control the majority of the approved therapies for PAH in the United States. Each of these companies has achieved considerable influence over prescribers through the sales and marketing of their respective therapies and through market dominance in this therapeutic area. Furthermore, the future commercialization and introduction of new PAH therapies into the market could exert downward pressure on the pricing of our products and reduce our market share. Discoveries or development of new products or technologies by others may make our products obsolete or seemingly inferior. Other companies may discover or introduce new products that render all or some of our technologies and products obsolete or noncompetitive. Our commercial therapies may have to compete with numerous investigational products currently in development. In addition, alternative approaches to treating chronic diseases, such as gene therapy, may make our products obsolete or noncompetitive. Other investigational therapies for PAH could be used in combination with, or as a substitute for, our therapies. If this occurs, doctors may reduce or discontinue the use of our pharmaceutical products for their patients. Sales of our products are subject to reimbursement from government agencies and other third parties. Pharmaceutical pricing and reimbursement pressures may cause our sales to suffer. The commercial success of our products and services depends, in part, on the availability of reimbursements by governmental payers such as Medicare and Medicaid, and private insurance companies. Accordingly, our commercial success is tied to such third party payers. In the United States, the European Union and other significant or potentially significant markets for our products, third party payers are increasingly attempting to limit or regulate the price of medicinal products and services, and are frequently challenging the pricing of new and expensive drugs. Consequently, it may be difficult for our specialty pharmaceutical distributors or wholesalers to obtain reimbursement of our products from third party payers. Alternatively, third party payers may reduce the amount of reimbursement for our products based on changes in pricing of other therapies for PAH, including generic formulations of other approved therapies. If third party payers do not approve our products for reimbursement, or limit reimbursements, patients could choose a competing product that is approved for reimbursement. Presently, most third party payers, including Medicare and Medicaid, reimburse the cost of our commercial products. Our prostacyclin analogue products, Remodulin and Tyvaso, are expensive therapies. The Medicare Modernization Act (MMA) requires that we negotiate a new price for our commercial products with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. As a result of the staggered implementation of the MMA, our products have not yet been subject to its pricing provisions; however, future reimbursements could be subject to reduction. Furthermore, to the extent that private insurers or managed care programs follow any reduced Medicaid and Medicare coverage and payment developments, the negative impact on our business would be compounded. We are currently assessing the potential effect of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and the related Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 on our business. While we believe the short term impact on our business of this legislation will not be material, we continue to monitor the developments of this legislation as many of its provisions are not yet effective and are subject to finalization. In Europe, the success of our commercial products and future products depends largely on obtaining and maintaining government reimbursement. In many European countries patients are unlikely to use prescription drugs that are not reimbursed by their governments. Reimbursement policies may adversely affect our ability to sell our products on a profitable basis. In many markets outside the United States, governments control the prices of prescription pharmaceuticals, including through the implementation of reference pricing, price cuts, rebates, revenue related taxes and profit 36 Table of Contents control, and expect prices of prescription pharmaceuticals to decline over the life of the product or as volumes increase. Our manufacturing strategy exposes us to significant risks. We must be able to produce sufficient quantities of our commercial products to satisfy demand. The process of manufacturing our products is difficult and complex, and currently involves a number of third parties. We produce treprostinil, the active ingredient in both Remodulin and Tyvaso, in our Silver Spring, Maryland facility using raw materials and advanced intermediate compounds supplied by vendors. Although we produce treprostinil, we outsource the manufacture of Remodulin to Baxter and Hollister Stier. We also rely on Catalent to manufacture Tyvaso. We are in the process of developing the capability to manufacture Remodulin and Tyvaso at our own facilities. Currently, we manufacture oral treprostinil tablets for use in our clinical trials, but neither we nor our third party vendors would be able to manufacture oral treprostinil on a commercial scale in the U.S. without FDA approval of a New Drug Application (NDA) for oral treprostinil or for international commercial sales without the corresponding international approvals. As long as we utilize third party vendors for significant portions of our manufacturing process, we will remain exposed to the risks described under the risk factor below titled We rely in part on third parties to perform activities that are critical to our business. Our ability to generate commercial sales or conduct clinical trials could suffer if our third party suppliers and service providers fail to perform. In addition, while we expect our efforts to internalize additional manufacturing processes will increase our control over manufacturing, it will also subject us to risks as we engage in complex manufacturing processes for the first time. For example, Remodulin and Tyvaso must be produced in a sterile environment, and we have no experience with sterile manufacturing on a commercial scale. Some of the products we are developing will involve even more complicated manufacturing processes than our current products. For example, the monoclonal antibodies we are developing are biologic products, which are inherently more difficult to manufacture than our current products and involve increased risk of viral and other contaminations. Additional risks presented by our manufacturing strategy include We and our third party manufacturers are subject to the FDA's current Good Manufacturing Practices in the United States and similar regulatory standards internationally. While we have significant control over regulatory compliance with respect to our internal manufacturing processes, we do not exercise the same level of control over regulatory compliance by our third party manufacturers; As we expand our manufacturing operations to include new elements of the manufacturing process or new products, we will need to design and implement processes and procedures to ensure compliance with applicable regulations; Even if we and our third party manufacturers are in compliance with domestic and international drug manufacturing regulations, the sterility and quality of the products being manufactured could be substandard and, therefore, such products would be unavailable for sale or use; If we have to replace a third party manufacturer with another manufacturer or our own manufacturing operations, the FDA and its international counterparts would require new testing and compliance inspections. Furthermore, a new manufacturer would have to be familiarized with the processes necessary to manufacture and commercially validate our products, as manufacturing our treprostinil based products is complex. Any new third party manufacturers and any new manufacturing process at our own facilities would need to be approved by the FDA and its international counterparts before being used to produce commercial supply of our products; 37 Table of Contents We may be unable to contract with needed manufacturers on satisfactory terms or at all; and The supply of materials and comp1nts necessary to manufacture and package our products may become scarce or interrupted. Disruptions to the supply of these materials could delay the manufacture and subsequent sale of such products. Any products manufactured with substituted materials or comp1nts would be subject to approval from the FDA and international regulatory agencies before they could be sold. The timing of any such regulatory approval is difficult to predict. Any of these factors could disrupt sales of our commercial products, delay clinical trials or commercialization of new products, result in product liability claims and product recalls, and entail higher costs. We rely in part on third parties to perform activities that are critical to our business. Our ability to generate commercial sales or conduct clinical trials could suffer if our third party suppliers and service providers fail to perform. Frequently, we involve third parties to assist us in conducting clinical trials, obtaining regulatory approvals, and marketing and distributing our products, as we do not possess the internal capacity to perform all of these functions. Accordingly, the success of these third parties in performing their contractual obligations is critical to our operations. We manufacture treprostinil with raw materials and advanced intermediate compounds supplied by vendors. The inability of our vendors to supply these raw materials and advanced intermediate compounds in the quantities we require could delay the manufacture of treprostinil for commercial use and for use in our clinical trials. We rely on Baxter to manufacture Remodulin for us, and the FDA recently approved Hollister Stier as a second manufacturer of Remodulin. We extended our contract with Baxter through 2013 and as part of that contract amendment, we agreed that Baxter will manufacture Remodulin in greater quantities using larger production equipment than under its current manufacturing process. This new manufacturing process and related equipment will require FDA and international approvals. Catalent manufactures Tyvaso for commercial use and also maintains the ability to manufacture oral treprostinil for us. In addition, Catalent conducts stability studies on Remodulin and Tyvaso for us and analyzes other products that we are developing. We are also evaluating alternative supply arrangements, including other third party production arrangements and the production of Remodulin and Tyvaso in our combination office and laboratory facility in Silver Spring, Maryland. If we are unable to successfully implement these alternatives, we may not have sufficient inventory to meet future demand. Presently, we are producing oral treprostinil for clinical trials at our manufacturing facility in Research Triangle Park, North Carolina. However, our process to manufacture oral treprostinil has not been approved for commercial use by the FDA or international regulatory agencies, and we may encounter unforeseen obstacles in seeking regulatory approval. NEBU TEC retains many responsibilities related to the manufacture of the Tyvaso Inhalation System, which includes a nebulizer and related accessories. Although we manage the manufacturing process, NEBU TEC supplies the labor. We rely on NEBU TEC, as we do for any third party contractor, to adhere to and maintain the manufacturing process in accordance with all applicable regulatory requirements. Any regulatory compliance problems encountered by NEBU TEC related to the manufacture of the Tyvaso Inhalation System could adversely affect the sale of Tyvaso. Until the fourth quarter of 2010, when we received approval for Minnetronix to serve as a second manufacturer of the Tyvaso Inhalation System, the NEBU TEC facility was the only facility currently approved for the manufacturing of the Tyvaso Inhalation System. If we are unable to manufacture or supply the Tyvaso Inhalation System in the quantities we require or if our suppliers are unable to supply sufficient parts 38 Table of Contents to manufacture the Tyvaso Inhalation System, it could delay, disrupt or prevent us from selling Tyvaso, which could impede our business and its projected growth. We rely on Accredo, CuraScript, and Caremark to market, distribute and sell Remodulin and Tyvaso in the United States. These distributors are also partially responsible for negotiating reimbursements from third party payers for the cost of our therapies. In March and April of 2010, we increased the price on all concentrations of Remodulin sold to our U.S. based and international distributors by 9.6 percent and 133 percent, respectively. In addition, we increased the price of Tyvaso by 4.9 percent in November 2010. Our price increases may not be fully reimbursed by third party payers. If our distributors do not achieve acceptable profit margins on our products, they may reduce or discontinue the sale of our products. Furthermore, if our domestic and international distributors devote fewer resources to selling our products or are unsuccessful in their sales efforts, our revenues may decline materially. We rely on Lilly to manufacture and supply Adcirca for us, and we use Lilly's pharmaceutical wholesaler ne2rk to distribute Adcirca in the United States and Puerto Rico. If Lilly is unable to manufacture or supply Adcirca or its distribution ne2rk is disrupted, it could delay, disrupt or prevent us from selling Adcirca, which could slow down the growth of our business. Although most of our current suppliers and service providers could eventually be replaced, a change in suppliers and or service providers could interrupt the manufacture and distribution of our commercial products and our other products and services, and impede the progress of our clinical trials, commercial launch plans and related revenues. Interruptions in manufacturing could be significant given the length of time and complexity involved in obtaining necessary FDA and other regulatory approvals for alternative arrangements, through either third parties or internal manufacturing processes. Our operations must comply with extensive laws and regulations in the U.S. and other countries, including FDA regulations. Failure to obtain approvals on a timely basis or to achieve continued compliance could delay, disrupt or prevent the commercialization of our products. The products we develop must be approved for marketing and sale by regulatory agencies and, once approved, are subject to extensive regulation. The process of obtaining and maintaining regulatory approvals for new drugs is lengthy, expensive and uncertain. The manufacture, distribution, advertising and marketing of these products are also subject to extensive regulation. Any future product approvals we receive could be accompanied by significant restrictions on the use or marketing of the product. Product candidates may fail to receive marketing approval on a timely basis, or at all. If granted, product approvals can be withdrawn for failure to comply with regulatory requirements, such as the FDA's post marketing requirement and post marketing commitments for Tyvaso or upon the occurrence of adverse events subsequent to commercial introduction. Discovery of previously unknown problems with our marketed products or problems with our manufacturing, regulatory, compliance, marketing or sales activities could result in regulatory restrictions on our products, including withdrawal of our products from the market. For example, in February 2010, we withdrew our MAA for Tyvaso as a result of findings by the EMA that certain of our clinical sites had failed to comply with Good Clinical Practices. If we fail to comply with applicable regulatory requirements, we could be subject to penalties that may consist of fines, suspension of regulatory approvals, product recalls, seizure of our products and or criminal prosecution. In addition, our reputation could be harmed as a result of any such regulatory restrictions or actions and patients and physicians may not want to use our products even after we have resolved these issues that led to such regulatory action. 39 Table of Contents We are subject to ongoing regulatory review of our currently marketed products. After any of our products receive regulatory approval, they remain subject to ongoing regulation, which can impact, among other things, product labeling, manufacturing practices, adverse event reporting, storage, distribution, advertising and promotion, and record keeping. If we do not comply with the applicable regulations, the range of possible sanctions includes issuance of adverse publicity, product recalls or seizures, fines, total or partial suspensions of production and or distribution, suspension of marketing applications, and enforcement actions, including injunctions and civil or criminal prosecution. The FDA and comparable international regulatory agencies can withdraw a product's approval under some circumstances, such as the failure to comply with regulatory requirements or unexpected safety issues. Further, the FDA often requires post marketing testing and surveillance to monitor the effects of approved products. The FDA and comparable international regulatory agencies may condition approval of our product candidates on the completion of such post marketing clinical studies. These post marketing studies may suggest that a product causes undesirable side effects or may present a risk to the patient. If data we collect from post marketing studies suggest that 1 of our approved products may present a risk to safety, the government authorities could withdraw our product approval, suspend production or place other marketing restrictions on our products. If regulatory sanctions are applied or if regulatory approval is delayed or withdrawn, our operating results and the value of our company may be adversely affected. Additionally, if we are unable to generate revenue from the sale of these products, our potential for generating positive cash flow will be diminished and the need for capital necessary to fund our operations will be increased. Regulatory approval for our currently marketed products is limited by the FDA to those specific indications and conditions for which clinical safety and efficacy have been demonstrated. Any regulatory approval of our products is limited to those specific diseases and indications for which our products are deemed to be safe and effective by the FDA. In addition to the FDA approval required for new formulations, any new indication for an approved product also requires FDA approval. If we are not able to obtain FDA approval for any desired future indications for our products, our ability to effectively market and sell our products may be reduced and our business may be adversely affected. While physicians may choose to prescribe drugs for uses that are not described in the product's labeling and for uses that differ from those approved by regulatory authorities (called "off label" uses), our ability to promote the products is limited to those indications that are specifically approved by the FDA. Although U.S. regulatory authorities generally do not regulate the behavior of physicians, they do restrict communications by companies on the subject of off label use. If our promotional activities fail to comply with these regulations or guidelines, we may be subject to warnings from, or enforcement action by, these authorities. In addition, our failure to follow FDA rules and guidelines relating to promotion and advertising may cause the FDA to delay or refuse approval for a product, the suspension or withdrawal of an approved product from the market, recalls, fines, disgorgement of m1y, operating restrictions, injunctions or criminal prosecution, any of which could harm our business. We must comply with various laws around the world that restrict certain marketing practices in the pharmaceutical and medical device industries. Failure to comply with such laws could result in penalties and have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Various laws around the world, including antikickback and false claims statutes, the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act (FCPA) and the UK Bribery Act, restrict particular marketing practices in the pharmaceutical and medical device industries. Although we have compliance programs and procedures 40 Table of Contents in place that we believe are effective, our business activities may be subject to challenge under these laws, and any penalties imposed upon us could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Furthermore, we have significantly expanded our sales and marketing staff recently. Although we train our sales and marketing staff under our corporate compliance programs, any expansion of sales and marketing efforts can have the effect of increasing the risk of noncompliance with these laws. In the United States, the federal health care program antikickback statute prohibits, among other things, knowingly and willfully offering, paying, soliciting, or receiving remuneration to induce, or in return for, purchasing, leasing, ordering, or arranging for the purchase, lease, or order of any health care item or service reimbursable under Medicare, Medicaid, or other federally financed healthcare programs. This statute has been interpreted to apply to arrangements between pharmaceutical manufacturers and prescribers, purchasers, and formulary managers. Although a number of statutory exemptions and regulatory safe harbors exist to protect certain common activities from prosecution, the exemptions and safe harbors are narrow, and practices that involve remuneration intended to induce prescriptions, purchases, or recommendations may be subject to scrutiny if they do not qualify for an exemption or safe harbor. Although we seek to comply with the conditions for reliance on these exemptions and safe harbors, our practices may not always meet all of the criteria for safe harbor protection from anti kickback liability. Federal false claims laws prohibit any person from knowingly presenting, or causing to be presented, a false claim for payment to the federal government, or knowingly making, or causing to be made, a false statement to get a false claim paid. Several pharmaceutical and health care companies have been prosecuted under these laws for allegedly providing free product to customers with the expectation that the customers would bill federal programs for the product. Other companies have been prosecuted for causing false claims to be submitted because of the company's marketing of the product for unapproved, and thus non reimbursable, uses. The majority of states also have statutes or regulations similar to the federal anti kickback law and false claims laws, which apply to Item and services reimbursed under Medicaid and other state programs, or, in several states, apply regardless of the payer. Sanctions under these federal and state laws may include civil m1tary penalties, exclusion of a manufacturer's products from reimbursement under government programs, criminal fines, and imprisonment. The PPACA imposes new reporting requirements for pharmaceutical and device manufacturers with regard to payments or other transfers of value made to physicians and teaching hospitals, effective March 30, 2013 In addition, pharmaceutical and device manufacturers will be required to report and disclose investment interests held by physicians and their immediate family members during the preceding calendar year. Such information is to be made publicly available by the Secretary of Health and Human Services in a searchable format beginning September 30, 2013 Failure to submit required information may result in civil m1tary penalties of up to $150,000 per year (and up to $1 million per year for "knowing failures") for all payments, transfers of value or ownership or investment interests not reported in an annual submission. Further, the PPACA amends the intent requirement of the federal anti kickback and criminal health care fraud statutes. A person or entity no longer needs to have actual knowledge of this statute or specific intent to violate it. In addition, the government may assert that a claim including Item or services resulting from a violation of the federal anti kickback statute constitutes a false or fraudulent claim for purposes of the false claims laws. If not preempted by this federal law, several states require pharmaceutical companies to report expenses relating to the marketing and promotion of pharmaceutical products and to report gifts and payments to individual physicians in those states. Other states prohibit various other marketing related activities. Still other states require the posting of information relating to clinical studies and their 41 Table of Contents outcomes. In addition, certain states, such as California, Nevada, and Massachusetts, require pharmaceutical companies to implement compliance programs or marketing codes and several other states are considering similar proposals. Compliance with these laws is difficult and time consuming, and companies that do not comply with these state laws face civil penalties. Government health care reform could increase our costs, which would adversely affect our revenue and results of operations. Our industry is highly regulated and changes in law may adversely impact our business, operations or financial results. The PPACA is a sweeping measure intended to expand healthcare coverage within the United States, primarily through the imposition of health insurance mandates on employers and individuals and expansion of the Medicaid program. The reforms imposed by the new law will significantly impact the pharmaceutical industry; however, the full effects of the PPACA cannot be known until these provisions are implemented and the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services and other federal and state agencies issue applicable regulations or guidance. Moreover, in the coming years, additional changes could be made to governmental healthcare programs that could significantly impact the success of our products or product candidates. We will continue to evaluate the PPACA, as amended, the implementation of regulations or guidance related to various provisions of the PPACA by federal agencies, as well as trends and changes that may be encouraged by the legislation and that may potentially have an impact on our business over time. Reports of actual or perceived side effects and adverse events associated with our products, such as sepsis, could cause physicians and patients to avoid or discontinue use of our products in favor of alternative treatments. Reports of side effects and adverse events associated with our products could have a significant adverse impact on the sale of our products. An example of a known risk associated with intravenous Remodulin is sepsis, which is a serious and potentially life threatening infection of the bloodstream caused by a wide variety of bacteria. Intravenous prostacyclins, such as intravenous Remodulin and Flolan, are infused continuously through a catheter placed in a large vein in the patient's chest, and sepsis is a known risk associated with this type of delivery. As a result, sepsis is included as a risk in both the Remodulin and Flolan package inserts. Although a discussion of the risk of sepsis is currently included on the Remodulin label, and the occurrence of sepsis is familiar to physicians who prescribe intravenously administered therapies, concerns about bloodstream infections may adversely affect a physician's prescribing practice of Remodulin. Our corporate compliance program cannot guarantee that we comply with all potentially applicable federal, state and international regulations. The development, manufacture, distribution, pricing, sales, marketing, and reimbursement of our products, together with our general operations, are subject to extensive federal, state, local and international regulations, which are constantly evolving. These regulations are subject to frequent revisions that often introduce more stringent requirements. While we believe we have developed and instituted adequate corporate compliance programs, we cannot ensure that we will always be in compliance with these regulations. If we fail to comply with any of these regulations, we could be subject to a range of penalties including, but not limited to the termination of clinical trials, the failure to receive approval of a product candidate, restrictions on our products or manufacturing processes, withdrawal of our products from the market, significant fines, exclusion from government healthcare programs, and other sanctions or litigation. 42 Table of Contents If the licenses, assignments and alliance agreements we depend on are breached or terminated, we could lose our right to develop and sell products covered by such agreements. Our business depends upon the acquisition, assignment and license of drugs and other products that have been discovered and initially developed by others. Under our product license agreements, we receive certain rights to existing intellectual property owned by others subject to the terms of each license agreement. Under agreements assigning intellectual property rights to us, the assignor transfers all right, title and interest in and to the intellectual property to us, which are subject to the terms of such agreements. In addition, we may be required to obtain licenses to other third party technologies to commercialize our early stage products. This dependence on technology developed by others involves the following risks We may be unable to obtain future licenses or assignment agreements at a reasonable cost or at all; If any of our licenses or assignment agreements are terminated, we will lose our rights to develop and market related products; Our license and assignment agreements generally provide the licensor or assignor the right to terminate these arrangements in the event we breach such agreements e.g., if we fail to pay royalties and other fees timely; and If a licensor or assignor fails to maintain the intellectual property licensed or assigned to us as required by most of our license and assignment agreements, we may lose our rights to develop and market some or all of our products. In addition, we may be forced to incur substantial costs to maintain the intellectual property ourselves or force the licensor or assignor to do so. Certain license and assignment agreements may restrict our ability to develop related products in certain countries or for particular diseases and may impose other restrictions on our freedom to develop and market our products. When we license or are assigned rights to drugs and other products that have been discovered and initially developed by others, our rights are frequently limited. For instance, our rights to market Adcirca are geographically limited to the United States and Puerto Rico; however, we would have an opportunity to negotiate with Lilly for the rights to market Adcirca in other territories in the event that Lilly decides not to market Adcirca in a particular territory. Furthermore, we cannot undertake any additional investigational work with respect to Adcirca in other indications of pulmonary hypertension without Lilly's prior approval. Lilly also has authority over all regulatory activities and has the right to determine the retail price for Adcirca and the wholesale price at which Lilly sells Adcirca to us. Provisions in our license and assignment agreements may impose other restrictions that affect our ability to develop and market related products. For example, Glaxo retained an exclusive option and right of first refusal to negotiate a license agreement with us if we decide to license any aspect of the commercialization of Remodulin and Tyvaso anywhere in the world. Similarly, our amended license agreement with Toray includes a conditional non compete clause that grants Toray the right to be our exclusive provider of beraprost MR. Moreover, we must also meet certain minimum annual sales to maintain our exclusive rights to beraprost MR. If our or our suppliers' patents or other intellectual property protections are inadequate, our revenues and profits could suffer or our competitors could force our products out of the market. The period under which our commercial and developmental therapies are protected by our patent rights is limited. Our U.S. patent for the method of treating PAH with Remodulin will expire in October 2014. Our 3 U.S. patents covering our current methods of synthesizing and producing treprostinil, the active ingredient in both Remodulin and Tyvaso, expire in October 2017. We also have 43 Table of Contents been granted 1 patent in the EU and 1 patent in Japan, each of which covers our treprostinil synthesis and production methods and will expire in October 2018. The patent for Adcirca for the treatment of pulmonary hypertension will expire in 2017 and our patents for Tyvaso will expire in the United States and in various countries throughout the EU in 2018 and 2020, respectively. We continue to conduct research into new methods to synthesize treprostinil and have 2 registered patents in the United States that expire in 2021, as well as, additional U.S. and international pending patent applications, relating to such methods. However, we cannot be sure that these additional patents will successfully deter competitors, or that additional patent applications will result in grants of patents. Upon the expiration of our patents, competitors may develop generic versions of our products and market those generic versions to compete with our products. Competitors may also seek to design around our patents prior to their expiration to develop competing products. The scope of any patent may be insufficient to deter competitors and patent laws of international jurisdictions may not protect our rights to the same extent as the patent laws of the United States. Furthermore, our suppliers' intellectual property protections may not be adequate. Consequently, competitors may attempt to invalidate our existing patents before they expire. In addition to patent protection, we also rely on trade secrets, proprietary know how and technological advances. We enter into confidentiality agreements with our employees and others, but these agreements may be ineffective in protecting our proprietary information. To the extent third party patents cover our products or services, we, or our strategic collaborators, would be required to seek licenses from the holders of these patents in order to manufacture, use, or sell our products and services. Payments under these licenses would reduce our profits from the sale of related products and services. Moreover, we may be unable to obtain these licenses on acceptable terms or at all. If we fail to obtain a required license or are unable to alter the design of our technology to avoid infringing a third party patent, we would be unable to market related products and services. We may initiate litigation to enforce or defend our patents or proprietary rights; however, litigation can be time consuming and costly and may not conclude favorably. If we are unsuccessful with respect to any future legal action in the defense of our patents and our patents are invalidated or canceled, our business could be negatively impacted. Furthermore, any licensed rights, patents or other intellectual property we possess may be challenged, invalidated, canceled, infringed or circumvented and, therefore, may not provide us with any competitive advantage. We may not maintain adequate insurance coverage to protect us against significant product liability claims. The testing, manufacturing, marketing, and sale of drugs and diagnostics involve product liability risks. Although we currently maintain product liability insurance, we may not be able to maintain this insurance at an acceptable cost, if at all. In addition, our insurance coverage may not be adequate for all potential claims. If claims or losses significantly exceed our liability insurance coverage, we may be forced out of business. Improper handling of hazardous materials used in our activities could expose us to significant liabilities. Our research and development and manufacturing activities involve the controlled use of chemicals and hazardous substances and we are expanding these activities in both scale and location. In addition, patients may dispose of our products using means we do not control. Such activities subject us to numerous federal, state, and local environmental and safety laws and regulations that govern the management, storage and disposal of hazardous materials. Compliance with current or future environmental laws and regulations can require significant costs; furthermore, we can be subject to substantial fines and penalties in the event of noncompliance. While we believe we comply with laws 44 Table of Contents and regulations governing these materials, the risk of accidental contamination or injury from these materials cannot be completely eliminated. Furthermore, once chemical and hazardous materials leave our facilities, we cannot control what our hazardous waste removal contractors choose to do with these materials. In the event of an accident, we could be liable for substantial civil damages or costs associated with the cleanup of the release of hazardous materials. Any related liability could exceed our resources and could have a materially adverse effect on our business. We may encounter substantial difficulties managing our growth relative to product demand. We have spent considerable resources building our laboratories and manufacturing facilities, and we are currently seeking regulatory approvals for some of these laboratories and all of our manufacturing facilities. These facilities may be insufficient to meet future demand for our products. Alternatively, we may have excess capacity at these facilities if future demand falls short of our expectations, or if we do not receive regulatory approvals for the products we intend to produce at these facilities. Constructing our facilities was expensive and our ability to recover our investment satisfactorily will depend on sales of the products manufactured at these facilities in sufficient volume. If we do experience substantial sales growth, we may have difficulty managing inventory levels as marketing new therapies is complicated, and gauging future demand can be difficult and uncertain. We intend to increase our internal manufacturing activities and reduce reliance on third party suppliers, but we may not be successful in doing so. As our manufacturing capabilities and sales forces grow, we will be faced with increasing regulatory risks and will need to develop appropriate processes and compliance programs to manage such risks. If we need additional financing and cannot obtain it, our product development and sales efforts may be limited. We may be required to seek additional sources of financing to meet unplanned or planned expenditures. Unplanned expenditures could be significant and may result from necessary modifications to product development plans or product offerings in response to difficulties encountered with clinical trials. We may also face unexpected costs in preparing products for commercial sale, or in maintaining sales levels of our currently marketed therapeutic products. If we are unable to obtain additional funding on commercially reasonable terms or at all, we may be compelled to delay clinical studies, curtail operations or obtain funds through collaborative arrangements that may require us to relinquish rights to certain products or potential markets. We may require additional financing to meet significant future obligations. For example, upon the maturity of our Convertible Senior Notes in October 2011, we must repay our investors in cash up to the principal balance of approximately $250.0 million. In addition, awards granted under our Share Tracking Awards Plan (STAP) entitle participants to receive in cash an amount equal to the appreciation in the price of our common stock, which is calculated as the positive difference between the closing price of our common stock on the date of exercise and the date of grant. Consequently, the STAP will likely require significant future cash payments to participants to the extent the price of our common stock continues to appreciate and the number of vested STAP awards increases over time. If we do not have sufficient funds to meet such contractual obligations or the ability to secure alternative sources of financing, we could be in default, face litigation and or lose key employees. 45 Table of Contents Risks Related to Our Common Stock The price of our common stock can be highly volatile and may decline. The price of common stock can be highly volatile within the pharmaceutical and biotechnology sector. Consequently, there can be significant price and volume fluctuations in the market that may not always relate to operating performance. The table below sets forth the high and low closing prices for our common stock for the periods indicated High Low January 1, 2010 December 31, 2010 $ 64.24 $ 46.22 January 1, 2009 December 31, 2009 $ 5288 $ 27.86 January 1, 2008 December 31, 2008 $ 57.99 $ 24.51 The price of our common stock could decline sharply due to the following factors, among others Quarterly and annual financial and operating results; Failure to meet estimates or expectations of securities analysts; The timing of enrollment and results of our clinical trials, including our ongoing studies of oral treprostinil for PAH; Physician, patient, investor or public concerns regarding the efficacy and or safety of products marketed or being developed by us or by others; Changes in, or new legislation and regulations affecting reimbursement of, our therapeutic products by Medicare or Medicaid and changes in reimbursement policies of private health insurance companies; Announcements by us or others of technological innovations or new products or announcements regarding our existing products; Interference in patent or other proprietary rights; Substantial sales of our common stock by us or our existing shareholders; Future issuances of common stock by us or any other activity which could be viewed as being dilutive to our shareholders; Rumors among or incorrect statements by investors and or analysts concerning our company, our products, or operations; Failure to maintain, or changes to, our approvals to sell our products; Discovery of previously unknown problems with our marketed products or problems with our manufacturing, regulatory, compliance, promotional, marketing or sales activities that result in regulatory restrictions on our products, including withdrawal of our products from the market; Failure to obtain or maintain regulatory approvals from the FDA and international regulatory agencies; Accumulation of significant short positions in our common stock by hedge funds or other investors or the significant accumulation of our common stock by hedge funds or other institutional investors with investment strategies that may lead to short term holdings; Timing and outcome of additional regulatory submissions and approvals; and General market conditions. 46 Table of Contents We may fail to meet third party projections for our revenues or profits. Many securities analysts publish independently developed quarterly and annual projections of our revenues and profits. Such estimates are inherently subject to uncertainty. As a result, actual revenues and profits may differ from these projections, and even small variations in reported revenues and profits compared to securities analysts' expectations could have a significant impact on the price of our common stock. Sales of our common stock may depress our stock price. The price of our common stock could decline if (1) we issue common stock to raise capital or to acquire a license or business; (2) our shareholders transfer ownership of our common stock, or sell substantial amounts in the public market; or (3) our investors become concerned that substantial sales of our common stock may occur. For example, Lilly has announced that they intend to sell a significant portion of our common stock they currently hold in 2011 A decrease in the price of our common stock could make it difficult for us to raise capital or fund acquisitions through the issuance of our stock. The conversion of some or all of the Convertible Senior Notes when the price of our common stock exceeds $5285 per share would dilute the ownership interests of our existing shareholders. Any sales of our common stock issued upon such conversion could adversely affect the prevailing market price of our common stock. Furthermore, the existence of the Convertible Senior Notes may encourage short selling by market participants because the conversion of the Convertible Senior Notes could depress the price of our common stock. The fundamental change purchase feature of the Convertible Senior Notes may delay or prevent an otherwise beneficial attempt to take over our company. We may be required to repurchase the Convertible Senior Notes from their holders in the event of a fundamental change, which includes a change of control of our company. This may delay or prevent a change of control of our company that would otherwise be beneficial to our shareholders. Provisions of Delaware law and our certificate of incorporation, by laws, shareholder rights plan, and employment and license agreements could prevent or delay a change of control or change in management that may be beneficial to our public shareholders. Certain provisions of Delaware law and our certificate of incorporation, by laws and shareholder rights plan may prevent, delay or discourage a merger, tender offer or proxy contest; the assumption of control by a holder of a large block of our securities; and or the replacement or removal of current management by our shareholders. For example, our certificate of incorporation divides our Board of Directors into 3 classes. Members of each class are elected for staggered 3 year terms. This provision may make it more difficult for shareholders to replace the majority of directors. It may also deter the accumulation of large blocks of our common stock by limiting the voting power of such blocks. Non competition and all other restrictive covenants in most of our employment agreements will terminate upon a change of control that is not approved by our Board. We enter into certain license agreements that generally prohibit our counterparties to these agreements or their affiliates from taking necessary steps to acquire or merge with us, directly or indirectly throughout the term of these agreements, plus a specified period thereafter. We are also party to certain license agreements that restrict our ability to assign or transfer the rights licensed to us 47 Table of Contents to third parties, including parties with whom we wish to merge, or those attempting to acquire us. These agreements often require that we obtain the prior consent of the counterparties to these agreements if we are contemplating a change of control. If our counterparties to these agreements withhold their consent, related agreements could be terminated and we would lose related license rights. For example, both Lilly and Toray have the right to terminate our license agreements relating to Adcirca and beraprost MR, respectively, in the event of certain change of control transactions. These restrictive change of control provisions could impede or prevent mergers that could benefit our shareholders. Our existing directors and executive officers own a substantial portion of our common stock and might be able to influence the outcome of matters requiring shareholder approval. Our directors and executive officers beneficially owned approximately 7.9 percent of our outstanding common stock as of December 31, 2010. Shares beneficially owned include stock options that could be exercised by those directors and executive officers within 60 days of December 31, 2010. Accordingly, these shareholders as a group may be able to influence the outcome of matters requiring shareholder approval, including the election of our directors. Such shareholder influence could delay or prevent a change of control that could benefit our shareholders. Because we do not intend to pay cash dividends, our shareholders must rely on stock appreciation for any return on their investment in us. We have never declared or paid cash dividends on our common stock. Furthermore, we do not intend to pay cash dividends in the future. As a result, the return on an investment in our common stock will depend entirely upon the future appreciation in the price of our common stock. There can be no assurances that our common stock will provide a return to investors. ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS N1 ITEM 2 PROPERTIES 
